Missouri, session 2026, SB1092.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 324.009, 332.081, 337.600, and 345.050, RSMo, are repealed
and forty-six new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 324.004, 324.009,
324.218, 324.1800, 324.1805, 324.1810, 324.1815, 324.1820, 324.1825, 324.1830, 324.1835,
324.1840, 324.1845, 324.1850, 324.1855, 324.1860, 324.1865, 332.081, 332.700, 332.705,
332.710, 332.715, 332.720, 332.725, 332.730, 332.735, 332.740, 332.745, 332.750, 332.755,
332.760, 334.1800, 334.1805, 334.1810, 334.1815, 334.1820, 334.1825, 334.1830, 334.1835,
334.1840, 334.1845, 334.1850, 334.1855, 334.1860, 337.600, and 345.050, to read as
follows:
324.004. 1. Any person who has at least three years of work experience in an
occupation or profession in another state, the District of Columbia, or any combination
of such jurisdictions, and whose work experience involved the practice of an occupation
or profession for which a license is not required in the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in
which the person worked but is required in this state, may submit an application for a
one-time nonrenewable two-year temporary license in this state in the occupation or
profession, along with proof of at least three years of work experience in the occupation
or profession and a fee as set by regulation of the oversight body, to the relevant
oversight body in this state. The oversight body shall make a determination of
qualification within forty-five days of receiving a completed application.
2. The oversight body shall require an applicant under this section to take and
pass the examination specific to the occupation or profession which is required for
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS SB 1092 2
licensure by those individuals applying pursuant to the provisions of the oversight
body's statutory and regulatory authority. An oversight body that administers an
examination on the laws of this state as part of its licensing application requirements
may require an applicant under this section to take and pass an examination specific to
the laws of this state.
3. The oversight body shall not issue a one-time nonrenewable temporary license
to any applicant described in subsection 1 of this section who has had any license in the
relevant occupation or profession revoked by an oversight body outside of this state,
who is currently under investigation, who has a complaint pending, or who is currently
under disciplinary action.
4. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, applicants for the
one-time temporary nonrenewable license under this section shall be citizens of the
United States or lawfully present noncitizens authorized to work in the United States
under federal law and shall submit legal proof of citizenship or employment
authorization that is acceptable for the employment eligibility verification under
federal law as part of the application. If the holder of a one-time nonrenewable
temporary license issued under this section loses lawful presence or federal work
authorization, the one-time nonrenewable temporary license shall automatically be
revoked.
(2) Applicants for the one-time nonrenewable temporary license under this
section in an occupation regulated by the board of therapeutic massage shall be citizens
of the United States and shall submit legal proof of citizenship as part of the application.
5. If an applicant is not currently residing in this state, the oversight body shall
conditionally approve the application contingent upon receipt of proof of domicile in
this state within sixty days of the applicant receiving the temporary license. If the
applicant fails to provide proof within sixty days of receiving the temporary license, the
oversight body may terminate the temporary license and the applicant may reapply for
a temporary license.
6. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the following:
(1) Any occupation whose oversight body has entered into a licensing compact
with another state for the regulation of practice under the oversight body's jurisdiction.
The provisions of this section shall not be construed to alter the authority granted by, or
any requirements promulgated pursuant to, any interjurisdictional or interstate
compacts adopted by this state or any reciprocity agreements with other states, and
whenever possible the provisions of this section shall be interpreted so as to imply no
conflict between it and any compact or any reciprocity agreement with other states;

HCS SB 1092 3
(2) Any occupation set forth in subsection 6 of section 290.257 or any electrical
contractor licensed under sections 324.900 to 324.945;
(3) Any occupation whose regulators or licensees are required to comply with
specific federal statutory, regulatory, and administrative requirements in order to
practice in this state; or
(4) Assistant physicians licensed under chapter 334.
7. The one-time nonrenewable temporary license shall expire after two years.
Upon expiration, the individual shall be required to apply for a permanent license in
accordance with the license requirements for the occupation for which he or she held the
temporary license.
8. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a license issued
under this section shall be valid only in this state and shall not make a licensee eligible to
be part of an interstate compact. An applicant who is licensed in another state pursuant
to an interstate compact shall not be eligible for licensure by an oversight body under
the provisions of this section.
9. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a license issued
under this section shall be valid only in this state and shall not make a licensee eligible to
obtain a license by reciprocity in another state.
10. As used in this section, the term "oversight body" means any board,
department, agency, or office of a jurisdiction that issues occupational or professional
licenses.
11. The division of professional registration may promulgate rules to implement
the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
324.009. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "License", a license, certificate, registration, permit, accreditation, or military
occupational speciality that enables a person to legally practice an occupation or profession in
a particular jurisdiction;
(2) "Military", the Armed Forces of the United States including the Air Force, Army,
Coast Guard, Marine Corps, Navy, Space Force, National Guard and any other military
branch that is designated by Congress as part of the Armed Forces of the United States, and

HCS SB 1092 4
all reserve components and auxiliaries. Such term also includes the military reserves and
militia of any United States territory or state;
(3) "Missouri law enforcement officer", any person employed by or otherwise serving
in a position for the state or a local governmental entity in the state of Missouri as a police
officer, peace officer certified under chapter 590, auxiliary police officer, sheriff, sheriff's
deputy, member of the patrol as that term is defined in section 43.010, or in some like position
involving the enforcement of the law and protection of the public interest at the risk of that
person's life and who is a permanent resident of the state of Missouri or who is domiciled in
the state of Missouri;
(4) "Nonresident military or law enforcement spouse":
(a) A nonresident spouse of an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United
States who has been transferred or is scheduled to be transferred to the state of Missouri, or
who has been transferred or is scheduled to be transferred to an adjacent state and is or will be
domiciled in the state of Missouri, or has moved to the state of Missouri on a permanent
change-of-station basis; or
(b) A nonresident spouse of a person residing outside the state of Missouri who has
accepted an offer of employment from and with the state or a local governmental entity in the
state of Missouri and who will become a Missouri law enforcement officer upon the
commencement of such employment;
(5) "Oversight body", any board, department, agency, or office of a jurisdiction that
issues licenses;
(6) "Resident military or law enforcement spouse", a spouse of an active duty
member of the Armed Forces of the United States who has been transferred or is scheduled to
be transferred to the state of Missouri or an adjacent state and who is a permanent resident of
the state of Missouri, who is domiciled in the state of Missouri, or who has Missouri as his or
her home of record, or a spouse of a Missouri law enforcement officer.
2. Any person who holds a valid current license issued by another state, a branch or
unit of the military, a territory of the United States, or the District of Columbia, and who has
been licensed for at least one year in such other jurisdiction, may submit an application for a
license in Missouri in the same occupation or profession, and at the same practice level, for
which he or she holds the current license, along with proof of current licensure and proof of
licensure for at least one year in the other jurisdiction, to the relevant oversight body in this
state.
3. The oversight body in this state shall:
(1) Within six months of receiving an application described in subsection 2 of this
section, waive any examination, educational, or experience requirements for licensure in this
state for the applicant if it determines that there were minimum education requirements and, if

HCS SB 1092 5
applicable, work experience and clinical supervision requirements in effect and the other
[state] jurisdiction verifies that the person met those requirements in order to be licensed or
certified in that [state] jurisdiction. An oversight body that administers an examination on
laws of this state as part of its licensing application requirement may require an applicant to
take and pass an examination specific to the laws of this state; or
(2) Within thirty days of receiving an application described in subsection 2 of this
section from a nonresident military or law enforcement spouse or a resident military or law
enforcement spouse, waive any examination, educational, or experience requirements for
licensure in this state for the applicant and issue such applicant a license under this section if
such applicant otherwise meets the requirements of this section.
4. (1) The oversight body shall not waive any examination, educational, or
experience requirements for any applicant who has had his or her license revoked by an
oversight body outside the state; who is currently under investigation, who has a complaint
pending, or who is currently under disciplinary action, except as provided in subdivision (2)
of this subsection, with an oversight body outside the state; who does not hold a license in
good standing with an oversight body outside the state; who has a criminal record that would
disqualify him or her for licensure in Missouri; or who does not hold a valid current license in
the other jurisdiction on the date the oversight body receives his or her application under this
section.
(2) If another jurisdiction has taken disciplinary action against an applicant, the
oversight body shall determine if the cause for the action was corrected and the matter
resolved. If the matter has not been resolved by that jurisdiction, the oversight body may
deny a license until the matter is resolved.
5. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the oversight body from denying a license to
an applicant under this section for any reason described in any section associated with the
occupation or profession for which the applicant seeks a license.
6. Any person who is licensed under the provisions of this section shall be subject to
the applicable oversight body's jurisdiction and all rules and regulations pertaining to the
practice of the licensed occupation or profession in this state. Any health care provider
licensed under the provisions of this section shall be deemed fully licensed to practice
within the profession's scope of practice in this state and may provide telehealth services
as described in section 191.1145 to the same extent and in the same manner as a health
care provider who received his or her license without a waiver of any requirements.
7. This section shall not be construed to waive any requirement for an applicant to
pay any fees, post any bonds or surety bonds, or submit proof of insurance associated with the
license the applicant seeks.

HCS SB 1092 6
8. This section shall not apply to business, professional, or occupational licenses
issued or required by political subdivisions.
9. The provisions of this section shall not impede an oversight body's authority to
require an applicant to submit fingerprints as part of the application process.
10. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to alter the authority granted
by, or any requirements promulgated pursuant to, any interjurisdictional or interstate
compacts adopted by Missouri statute or any reciprocity agreements with other states in
effect, and whenever possible this section shall be interpreted so as to imply no conflict
between it and any compact, or any reciprocity agreements with other states in effect.
11. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a license issued under this section
shall be valid only in this state and shall not make a licensee eligible to be part of an interstate
compact. An applicant who is licensed in another state pursuant to an interstate compact shall
not be eligible for licensure by an oversight body under the provisions of this section.
12. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any occupation set forth in
subsection 6 of section 290.257, or any electrical contractor licensed under sections 324.900
to 324.945.
324.218. 1. An applicant who has not previously taken or passed an examination
recognized by the committee and who meets the qualifications of subsection 2 of section
324.210 may obtain without examination a nonrenewable temporary license by paying a
temporary-license fee and submitting to the committee an agreement-to-supervise form
that is signed by a licensed dietitian who has agreed to supervise the applicant. Such
temporary licensee may practice dietetics, but any such practice shall be under the
supervision of a dietitian licensed in this state.
2. (1) Any dietitian who has agreed to supervise a temporary licensee shall hold
an unencumbered license to practice dietetics in this state and shall provide the
committee proof of active dietetics practice in this state for a minimum of one year
before supervising the temporary licensee.
(2) The supervising dietitian shall not be an immediate family member of the
temporary licensee. The committee shall define the term "immediate family member"
for purposes of this subdivision and the scope of such supervision by rule.
3. (1) The dietitian who has agreed to supervise the applicant for a temporary
license shall submit to the committee a signed and notarized form prescribed by the
committee attesting that the applicant for a temporary license shall begin employment
at a location in this state within seven days of issuance of the temporary license.
(2) If the temporary licensee's employment described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection ceases, the supervising dietitian shall notify the committee within three days
of such cessation.

HCS SB 1092 7
4. A licensed dietitian shall not supervise more than one temporary licensee at a
time.
5. The temporary license obtained by an applicant under this section shall expire
the date the committee is notified by the supervising dietitian that the temporary
licensee's employment has ceased or within one hundred eighty days of its issuance,
whichever occurs first.
324.1800. 1. Sections 324.1800 to 324.1865 shall be known and may be cited as
the "Dietitian Licensure Compact".
2. The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate Practice of Dietetics
with the goal of improving public access to dietetics services. This Compact preserves
the regulatory authority of States to protect public health and safety through the
current system of State licensure, while also providing for licensure portability through
a Compact Privilege granted to qualifying professionals.
3. This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
(1) Increase public access to dietetics services;
(2) Provide opportunities for interstate practice by Licensed Dietitians who meet
uniform requirements;
(3) Eliminate the necessity for Licenses in multiple States;
(4) Reduce administrative burden on Member States and Licensees;
(5) Enhance the States' ability to protect the public's health and safety;
(6) Encourage the cooperation of Member States in regulating multistate
practice of Licensed Dietitians;
(7) Support relocating Active Military Members and their spouses;
(8) Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and disciplinary
information among Member States; and
(9) Vest all Member States with the authority to hold a Licensed Dietitian
accountable for meeting all State practice laws in the State in which the patient is
located at the time care is rendered.
324.1805. As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the
following definitions shall apply:
(1) "ACEND" means the Accreditation Council for Education in Nutrition and
Dietetics or its successor organization.
(2) "Active Military Member" means any individual with full-time duty status in
the active armed forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard
and Reserve.
(3) "Adverse Action" means any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal
action permitted by a State's laws which is imposed by a Licensing Authority or other

HCS SB 1092 8
authority against a Licensee, including actions against an individual's License or
Compact Privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the
Licensee, limitation on the Licensee's practice, or any other Encumbrance on licensure
affecting a Licensee's authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease and desist
action.
(4) "Alternative Program" means a non-disciplinary monitoring or practice
remediation process approved by a Licensing Authority.
(5) "Charter Member State" means any Member State which enacted this
Compact by law before the Effective Date specified in section 324.1855.
(6) "Continuing Education" means a requirement, as a condition of License
renewal, to provide evidence of participation in, and completion of, educational and
professional activities relevant to practice or area of work.
(7) "CDR" means the Commission on Dietetic Registration or its successor
organization.
(8) "Compact Commission" means the government agency whose membership
consists of all States that have enacted this Compact, which is known as the Dietitian
Licensure Compact Commission, as described in section 324.1835, and which shall
operate as an instrumentality of the Member States.
(9) "Compact Privilege" means a legal authorization, which is equivalent to a
License, permitting the Practice of Dietetics in a Remote State.
(10) "Current Significant Investigative Information" means:
(a) Investigative Information that a Licensing Authority, after a preliminary
inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the subject Licensee to
respond, if required by State law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved
true, would indicate more than a minor infraction; or
(b) Investigative Information that indicates that the subject Licensee represents
an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the subject
Licensee has been notified and had an opportunity to respond.
(11) "Data System" means a repository of information about Licensees,
including, but not limited to, Continuing Education, examination, licensure,
investigative, Compact Privilege and Adverse Action information.
(12) "Encumbered License" means a License in which an Adverse Action
restricts a Licensee's ability to practice dietetics.
(13) "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation on a
Licensee's full and unrestricted Practice of Dietetics by a Licensing Authority.

HCS SB 1092 9
(14) "Executive Committee" means a group of delegates elected or appointed to
act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, this Compact, and the
Compact Commission.
(15) "Home State" means the Member State that is the Licensee's primary State
of residence or that has been designated pursuant to section 324.1825.
(16) "Investigative Information" means information, records, and documents
received or generated by a Licensing Authority pursuant to an investigation.
(17) "Jurisprudence Requirement" means an assessment of an individual's
knowledge of the State laws and regulations governing the Practice of Dietetics in such
State.
(18) "License" means an authorization from a Member State to either:
(a) Engage in the Practice of Dietetics (including medical nutrition therapy); or
(b) Use the title "dietitian," "licensed dietitian," "licensed dietitian nutritionist,"
"certified dietitian," or other title describing a substantially similar practitioner as the
Compact Commission may further define by Rule.
(19) "Licensee" or "Licensed Dietitian" means an individual who currently
holds a License and who meets all of the requirements outlined in section 324.1815.
(20) "Licensing Authority" means the board or agency of a State, or equivalent,
that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of the Practice of Dietetics.
(21) "Member State" means a State that has enacted the Compact.
(22) "Practice of Dietetics" means the synthesis and application of dietetics as
defined by state law and regulations, primarily for the provision of nutrition care
services, including medical nutrition therapy, in person or via telehealth, to prevent,
manage, or treat diseases or medical conditions and promote wellness.
(23) "Registered Dietitian" means a person who:
(a) Has completed applicable education, experience, examination, and
recertification requirements approved by CDR;
(b) Is credentialed by CDR as a registered dietitian or a registered dietitian
nutritionist; and
(c) Is legally authorized to use the title registered dietitian or registered dietitian
nutritionist and the corresponding abbreviations "RD" or "RDN."
(24) "Remote State" means a Member State other than the Home State, where a
Licensee is exercising or seeking to exercise a Compact Privilege.
(25) "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by the Compact Commission that
has the force of law.
(26) "Single State License" means a License issued by a Member State within
the issuing State and does not include a Compact Privilege in any other Member State.

HCS SB 1092 10
(27) "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United
States of America.
(28) "Unencumbered License" means a License that authorizes a Licensee to
engage in the full and unrestricted Practice of Dietetics.
324.1810. 1. To participate in the Compact, a State must currently:
(1) License and regulate the Practice of Dietetics; and
(2) Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about
Licensees.
2. A Member State shall:
(1) Participate fully in the Compact Commission's Data System, including using
the unique identifier as defined in Rules;
(2) Notify the Compact Commission, in compliance with the terms of the
Compact and Rules, of any Adverse Action or the availability of Current Significant
Investigative Information regarding a Licensee;
(3) Implement or utilize procedures for considering the criminal history record
information of applicants for an initial Compact Privilege. These procedures shall
include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by
applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant's criminal history record
information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for
retaining that State's criminal records;
(a) A Member State must fully implement a criminal history record information
requirement, within a time frame established by Rule, which includes receiving the
results of the Federal Bureau of Investigation record search and shall use those results
in determining Compact Privilege eligibility.
(b) Communication between a Member State and the Compact Commission or
among Member States regarding the verification of eligibility for a Compact Privilege
shall not include any information received from the Federal Bureau of Investigation
relating to a federal criminal history record information check performed by a Member
State;
(4) Comply with and enforce the Rules of the Compact Commission;
(5) Require an applicant for a Compact Privilege to obtain or retain a License in
the Licensee's Home State and meet the Home State's qualifications for licensure or
renewal of licensure, as well as all other applicable State laws; and
(6) Recognize a Compact Privilege granted to a Licensee who meets all of the
requirements outlined in section 324.1815 in accordance with the terms of the Compact
and Rules.
3. Member States may set and collect a fee for granting a Compact Privilege.

HCS SB 1092 11
4. Individuals not residing in a Member State shall continue to be able to apply
for a Member State's Single State License as provided under the laws of each Member
State. However, the Single State License granted to these individuals shall not be
recognized as granting a Compact Privilege to engage in the Practice of Dietetics in any
other Member State.
5. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established by a
Member State for the issuance of a Single State License.
6. At no point shall the Compact Commission have the power to define the
requirements for the issuance of a Single State License to practice dietetics. The
Member States shall retain sole jurisdiction over the provision of these requirements.
324.1815. 1. To exercise the Compact Privilege under the terms and provisions
of the Compact, the Licensee shall:
(1) Satisfy one of the following:
(a) Hold a valid current registration that gives the applicant the right to use the
term Registered Dietitian; or
(b) Complete all of the following:
a. An education program which is either:
(i) A master's degree or doctoral degree that is programmatically accredited by:
i. ACEND; or
ii. A dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
Education, which the Compact Commission may by Rule determine, and from a college
or university accredited at the time of graduation by the appropriate regional
accrediting agency recognized by the Council on Higher Education Accreditation and
the United States Department of Education.
(ii) An academic degree from a college or university in a foreign country
equivalent to the degree described in item (i) that is programmatically accredited by:
i. ACEND; or
ii. A dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
Education, which the Compact Commission may by Rule determine.
b. A planned, documented, supervised practice experience in dietetics that is
programmatically accredited by:
(i) ACEND; or
(ii) A dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
Education which the Compact Commission may by Rule determine and which involves
at least 1000 hours of practice experience under the supervision of a Registered Dietitian
or a Licensed Dietitian.
c. Successful completion of either:

HCS SB 1092 12
(i) The Registration Examination for Dietitians administered by CDR; or
(ii) A national credentialing examination for dietitians approved by the Compact
Commission by Rule; such completion being no more than five years prior to the date of
the Licensee's application for initial licensure and accompanied by a period of
continuous licensure thereafter, all of which may be further governed by the Rules of the
Compact Commission;
(2) Hold an Unencumbered License in the Home State;
(3) Notify the Compact Commission that the Licensee is seeking a Compact
Privilege within a Remote State or States;
(4) Pay any applicable fees, including any State fee, for the Compact Privilege;
(5) Meet any Jurisprudence Requirements established by the Remote State or
States in which the Licensee is seeking a Compact Privilege; and
(6) Report to the Compact Commission any Adverse Action, Encumbrance, or
restriction on a License taken by any non-Member State within 30 days from the date
the action is taken.
2. The Compact Privilege is valid until the expiration date of the Home State
License. To maintain a Compact Privilege, renewal of the Compact Privilege shall be
congruent with the renewal of the Home State License as the Compact Commission may
define by Rule. The Licensee must comply with the requirements of subsection 1 of this
section to maintain the Compact Privilege in the Remote State or States.
3. A Licensee exercising a Compact Privilege shall adhere to the laws and
regulations of the Remote State. Licensees shall be responsible for educating themselves
on, and complying with, any and all State laws relating to the Practice of Dietetics in
such Remote State.
4. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary provided in this Compact or State
law, a Licensee exercising a Compact Privilege shall not be required to complete
Continuing Education Requirements required by a Remote State. A Licensee exercising
a Compact Privilege is only required to meet any Continuing Education Requirements
as required by the Home State.
324.1820. 1. A Licensee may hold a Home State License, which allows for a
Compact Privilege in other Member States, in only one Member State at a time.
2. If a Licensee changes Home State by moving between two Member States:
(1) The Licensee shall file an application for obtaining a new Home State License
based on a Compact Privilege, pay all applicable fees, and notify the current and new
Home State in accordance with the Rules of the Compact Commission.
(2) Upon receipt of an application for obtaining a new Home State License by
virtue of a Compact Privilege, the new Home State shall verify that the Licensee meets

HCS SB 1092 13
the criteria in section 324.1815 via the Data System, and require that the Licensee
complete the following:
(a) Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint based criminal history record
information check;
(b) Any other criminal history record information required by the new Home
State; and
(c) Any Jurisprudence Requirements of the new Home State.
(3) The former Home State shall convert the former Home State License into a
Compact Privilege once the new Home State has activated the new Home State License
in accordance with applicable Rules adopted by the Compact Commission.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Compact, if the Licensee cannot
meet the criteria in section 324.1815, the new Home State may apply its requirements
for issuing a new Single State License.
(5) The Licensee shall pay all applicable fees to the new Home State in order to
be issued a new Home State License.
3. If a Licensee changes their State of residence by moving from a Member State
to a non-Member State, or from a non-Member State to a Member State, the State
criteria shall apply for issuance of a Single State License in the new State.
4. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with a Licensee's ability to hold a
Single State License in multiple States; however, for the purposes of this Compact, a
Licensee shall have only one Home State License.
5. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established by a
Member State for the issuance of a Single State License.
324.1825. An Active Military Member, or their spouse, shall designate a Home
State where the individual has a current License in good standing. The individual may
retain the Home State designation during the period the service member is on active
duty.
324.1830. 1. In addition to the other powers conferred by State law, a Remote
State shall have the authority, in accordance with existing State due process law, to:
(1) Take Adverse Action against a Licensee's Compact Privilege within that
Member State; and
(2) Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the
attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas
issued by a Licensing Authority in a Member State for the attendance and testimony of
witnesses or the production of evidence from another Member State shall be enforced in
the latter State by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and
procedure applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before that court. The

HCS SB 1092 14
issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees
required by the service statutes of the State in which the witnesses or evidence are
located.
2. Only the Home State shall have the power to take Adverse Action against a
Licensee's Home State License.
3. For purposes of taking Adverse Action, the Home State shall give the same
priority and effect to reported conduct received from a Member State as it would if the
conduct had occurred within the Home State. In so doing, the Home State shall apply
its own State laws to determine appropriate action.
4. The Home State shall complete any pending investigations of a Licensee who
changes Home States during the course of the investigations. The Home State shall also
have authority to take appropriate action or actions and shall promptly report the
conclusions of the investigations to the administrator of the Data System. The
administrator of the Data System shall promptly notify the new Home State of any
Adverse Actions.
5. A Member State, if otherwise permitted by State law, may recover from the
affected Licensee the costs of investigations and dispositions of cases resulting from any
Adverse Action taken against that Licensee.
6. A Member State may take Adverse Action based on the factual findings of
another Remote State, provided that the Member State follows its own procedures for
taking the Adverse Action.
7. (1) In addition to the authority granted to a Member State by its respective
State law, any Member State may participate with other Member States in joint
investigations of Licensees.
(2) Member States shall share any investigative, litigation, or compliance
materials in furtherance of any joint investigation initiated under the Compact.
8. If Adverse Action is taken by the Home State against a Licensee's Home State
License resulting in an Encumbrance on the Home State License, the Licensee's
Compact Privilege or Privileges in all other Member States shall be revoked until all
Encumbrances have been removed from the Home State License. All Home State
disciplinary orders that impose Adverse Action against a Licensee shall include a
statement that the Licensee's Compact Privileges are revoked in all Member States
during the pendency of the order.
9. Once an Encumbered License in the Home State is restored to an
Unencumbered License (as certified by the Home State's Licensing Authority), the
Licensee must meet the requirements of subsection 1 of section 324.1815 and follow the

HCS SB 1092 15
administrative requirements to reapply to obtain a Compact Privilege in any Remote
State.
10. If a Member State takes Adverse Action, it shall promptly notify the
administrator of the Data System. The administrator of the Data System shall promptly
notify the other Member States of any Adverse Actions.
11. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State's decision that
participation in an Alternative Program may be used in lieu of Adverse Action.
324.1835. 1. The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a joint
government agency whose membership consists of all Member States that have enacted
the Compact known as the Dietitian Licensure Compact Commission. The Compact
Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact States acting jointly and not an
instrumentality of any one State. The Compact Commission shall come into existence
on or after the effective date of the Compact as set forth in section 324.1855.
2. (1) Each Member State shall have and be limited to one (1) delegate selected
by that Member State's Licensing Authority.
(2) The delegate shall be the primary administrator of the Licensing Authority
or their designee.
(3) The Compact Commission shall by Rule or bylaw establish a term of office
for delegates and may by Rule or bylaw establish term limits.
(4) The Compact Commission may recommend removal or suspension of any
delegate from office.
(5) A Member State's Licensing Authority shall fill any vacancy of its delegate
occurring on the Compact Commission within 60 days of the vacancy.
(6) Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters before the Compact
Commission requiring a vote by the delegates.
(7) Delegates shall meet and vote by such means as set forth in the bylaws. The
bylaws may provide for delegates to meet and vote in-person or by telecommunication,
video conference, or other means of communication.
(8) The Compact Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The Compact Commission
may meet in person or by telecommunication, video conference, or other means of
communication.
3. The Compact Commission shall have the following powers:
(1) Establish the fiscal year of the Compact Commission;
(2) Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
(3) Establish and amend Rules and bylaws;
(4) Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;

HCS SB 1092 16
(5) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this
Compact, the Compact Commission's Rules, and the bylaws;
(6) Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
Compact Commission, provided that the standing of any Licensing Authority to sue or
be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
(7) Maintain and certify records and information provided to a Member State as
the authenticated business records of the Compact Commission, and designate an agent
to do so on the Compact Commission's behalf;
(8) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(9) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not
limited to, employees of a Member State;
(10) Conduct an annual financial review;
(11) Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties,
grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact,
and establish the Compact Commission's personnel policies and programs relating to
conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
(12) Assess and collect fees;
(13) Accept any and all appropriate donations, grants of money, other sources of
revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, services, and gifts, and receive, utilize, and
dispose of the same; provided that at all times the Compact Commission shall avoid any
actual or appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;
(14) Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real,
personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
(15) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise
dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
(16) Establish a budget and make expenditures;
(17) Borrow money;
(18) Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of members,
State regulators, State legislators or their representatives, and consumer
representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in this
Compact or the bylaws;
(19) Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement
agencies;
(20) Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a chair and a vice
chair;

HCS SB 1092 17
(21) Determine whether a State's adopted language is materially different from
the model compact language such that the State would not qualify for participation in
the Compact; and
(22) Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve
the purposes of this Compact.
4. (1) The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the
Compact Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The powers, duties, and
responsibilities of the Executive Committee shall include:
(a) Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the Compact
including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the Compact, its Rules and
bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary;
(b) Recommend to the Compact Commission changes to the Rules or bylaws,
changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact Member States, fees
charged to Licensees, and other fees;
(c) Ensure Compact administration services are appropriately provided,
including by contract;
(d) Prepare and recommend the budget;
(e) Maintain financial records on behalf of the Compact Commission;
(f) Monitor Compact compliance of Member States and provide compliance
reports to the Compact Commission;
(g) Establish additional committees as necessary;
(h) Exercise the powers and duties of the Compact Commission during the
interim between Compact Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending
Rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties
expressly reserved to the Compact Commission by Rule or bylaw; and
(i) Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the Compact Commission.
(2) The Executive Committee shall be composed of nine members:
(a) The chair and vice chair of the Compact Commission shall be voting
members of the Executive Committee;
(b) Five voting members from the current membership of the Compact
Commission, elected by the Compact Commission;
(c) One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized professional association
representing dietitians; and
(d) One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized national credentialing
100 organization for dietitians.
101 (3) The Compact Commission may remove any member of the Executive
102 Committee as provided in the Compact Commission's bylaws.

HCS SB 1092 18
103 (4) (a) The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
104 (b) Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that the
105 Executive Committee may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in
106 subdivision (2) of subsection 6 of this section.
107 (c) The Executive Committee shall give 30 days' notice of its meetings, posted on
108 the website of the Compact Commission and as determined to provide notice to persons
109 with an interest in the business of the Compact Commission.
110 (d) The Executive Committee may hold a special meeting in accordance with
111 paragraph (c) of subdivision (1) of subsection 6 of this section.
112 5. The Compact Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member States an
113 annual report.
114 6. (1) (a) All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the Compact
115 Commission may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in subdivision (2) of
116 this subsection.
117 (b) Public notice for all meetings of the full Compact Commission shall be given
118 in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in section 324.1845,
119 except that the Compact Commission may hold a special meeting as provided in
120 paragraph (c) of this subdivision.
121 (c) The Compact Commission may hold a special meeting when it must meet to
122 conduct emergency business by giving 24 hours' notice to all Member States, on the
123 Compact Commission's website, and other means as provided in the Compact
124 Commission's Rules. The Compact Commission's legal counsel shall certify that the
125 Compact Commission's need to meet qualifies as an emergency.
126 (2) The Compact Commission or the Executive Committee or other committees
127 of the Compact Commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting for the
128 Compact Commission or Executive Committee or other committees of the Compact
129 Commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
130 (a) Non-compliance of a Member State with its obligations under the Compact;
131 (b) The employment, compensation, discipline, or other matters, practices, or
132 procedures related to specific employees;
133 (c) Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee by the Compact Commission
134 or by a Member State's Licensing Authority;
135 (d) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
136 (e) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or
137 real estate;
138 (f) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;

HCS SB 1092 19
139 (g) Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or
140 confidential;
141 (h) Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly
142 unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
143 (i) Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
144 (j) Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of
145 or for use of the Compact Commission or other committee charged with responsibility
146 of investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact;
147 (k) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or Member State
148 law; or
149 (l) Other matters as specified in the Rules of the Compact Commission.
150 (3) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall state
151 that the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and
152 such reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
153 (4) The Compact Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe
154 all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of
155 actions taken, and the reasons therefor, including a description of the views expressed.
156 All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such
157 minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal,
158 subject to release only by a majority vote of the Compact Commission or order of a
159 court of competent jurisdiction.
160 7. (1) The Compact Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the
161 reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
162 (2) The Compact Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue
163 sources as provided in subdivision (13) of subsection 3 of this section.
164 (3) The Compact Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment
165 from each Member State and impose fees on Licensees of Member States to whom it
166 grants a Compact Privilege to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the
167 Compact Commission and its staff, which must, in a total amount, be sufficient to cover
168 its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other
169 sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for Member States shall be allocated
170 based upon a formula that the Compact Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
171 (4) The Compact Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to
172 securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Compact Commission
173 pledge the credit of any of the Member States, except by and with the authority of the
174 Member State.

HCS SB 1092 20
175 (5) The Compact Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
176 disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Compact Commission shall be
177 subject to the financial review and accounting procedures established under its bylaws.
178 However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Compact Commission
179 shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or licensed public
180 accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be included in and become part
181 of the annual report of the Compact Commission.
182 8. (1) The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives
183 of the Compact Commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally
184 and in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal
185 injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,
186 or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a
187 reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Compact Commission
188 employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this subdivision shall
189 be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss,
190 injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
191 person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the Compact Commission shall
192 not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
193 (2) The Compact Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive
194 director, employee, and representative of the Compact Commission in any civil action
195 seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that
196 occurred within the scope of Compact Commission employment, duties, or
197 responsibilities, or as determined by the Compact Commission that the person
198 against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
199 scope of Compact Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that
200 nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own
201 counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error,
202 or omission did not result from that person's intentional or willful or wanton
203 misconduct.
204 (3) The Compact Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member,
205 officer, executive director, employee, and representative of the Compact Commission for
206 the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of
207 any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Compact
208 Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a
209 reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Compact Commission
210 employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or

HCS SB 1092 21
211 omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
212 person.
213 (4) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any
214 Licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by
215 any other applicable State laws.
216 (5) Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate
217 a Member State's state action immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect
218 to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or federal
219 antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
220 (6) Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign
221 immunity by the Member States or by the Compact Commission.
324.1840. 1. The Compact Commission shall provide for the development,
maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated Data System.
2. The Compact Commission shall assign each applicant for a Compact Privilege
a unique identifier, as determined by the Rules.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary, a Member
State shall submit a uniform data set to the Data System on all individuals to whom this
Compact is applicable as required by the Rules of the Compact Commission, including:
(1) Identifying information;
(2) Licensure data;
(3) Adverse Actions against a License or Compact Privilege and information
related thereto;
(4) Non-confidential information related to Alternative Program participation,
the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information related to
such participation not made confidential under Member State law;
(5) Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason or reasons for such
denial;
(6) The presence of Current Significant Investigative Information; and
(7) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this Compact or
the protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of the Compact Commission.
4. The records and information provided to a Member State pursuant to this
Compact or through the Data System, when certified by the Compact Commission or an
agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business records of the Compact
Commission, and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant
judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative proceedings in a Member State.
5. Current Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in any
Member State will only be available to other Member States.

HCS SB 1092 22
6. It is the responsibility of the Member States to report any Adverse Action
against a Licensee and to monitor the Data System to determine whether any Adverse
Action has been taken against a Licensee. Adverse Action information pertaining to a
Licensee in any Member State will be available to any other Member State.
7. Member States contributing information to the Data System may designate
information that may not be shared with the public without the express permission of
the contributing State.
8. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently expunged
pursuant to federal law or the laws of the Member State contributing the information
shall be removed from the Data System.
324.1845. 1. The Compact Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in
order to effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and
provisions of the Compact. A Rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect only if a
court of competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is invalid because the Compact
Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope
and purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based upon another
applicable standard of review.
2. The Rules of the Compact Commission shall have the force of law in each
Member State, provided however that where the Rules conflict with the laws or
regulations of a Member State that relate to the procedures, actions, and processes a
Licensed Dietitian is permitted to undertake in that State and the circumstances under
which they may do so, as held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the
Compact Commission shall be ineffective in that State to the extent of the conflict.
3. The Compact Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to
the criteria set forth in this Section and the Rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall
become binding on the day following adoption or as of the date specified in the Rule or
amendment, whichever is later.
4. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States rejects a Rule or portion
of a Rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the
Compact within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall
have no further force and effect in any Member State.
5. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the Compact
Commission.
6. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Compact Commission shall hold a
public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts,
opinions, and arguments.

HCS SB 1092 23
7. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Compact Commission, and at
least thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at which the Compact Commission will
hold a public hearing on the proposed Rule, the Compact Commission shall provide a
Notice of Proposed rulemaking:
(1) On the website of the Compact Commission or other publicly accessible
platform;
(2) To persons who have requested notice of the Compact Commission's notices
of proposed rulemaking; and
(3) In such other way or ways as the Compact Commission may by Rule specify.
8. The Notice of Proposed rulemaking shall include:
(1) The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the Compact
Commission will hear public comments on the proposed Rule and, if different, the time,
date, and location of the meeting where the Compact Commission will consider and vote
on the proposed Rule;
(2) If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other
means of communication, the Compact Commission shall include the mechanism for
access to the hearing in the Notice of Proposed rulemaking;
(3) The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
(4) A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any interested person;
and
(5) The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
9. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written
comments and documents received by the Compact Commission in response to the
proposed Rule shall be available to the public.
10. Nothing in this Section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on
each Rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Compact Commission at
hearings required by this Section.
11. (1) The Compact Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take
final action on the proposed Rule based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the
Rule.
(2) The Compact Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule provided
the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed Rule.
(3) The Compact Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for
substantive changes made to the proposed Rule as well as reasons for substantive
changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
(4) The Compact Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the
Rule. Except for an emergency as provided in subsection 12 of this section, the effective

HCS SB 1092 24
date of the Rule shall be no sooner than 30 days after issuing the notice that it adopted
or amended the Rule.
12. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Compact Commission
may consider and adopt an emergency Rule with 24 hours' notice, with opportunity to
comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and
in this Section shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as reasonably possible,
in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the Rule. For the
purposes of this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted immediately
in order to:
(1) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
(2) Prevent a loss of Compact Commission or Member State funds;
(3) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is established by federal
law or rule; or
(4) Protect public health and safety.
13. The Compact Commission or an authorized committee of the Compact
Commission may direct revision to a previously adopted Rule for purposes of correcting
typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors.
Public notice of any revision shall be posted on the website of the Compact Commission.
The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days
after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results
in a material change to a Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the
Compact Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the
revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision
may not take effect without the approval of the Compact Commission.
14. No Member State's rulemaking requirements shall apply under this
Compact.
324.1850. 1. (1) The executive and judicial branches of State government in
each Member State shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to implement this Compact.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this Compact, venue is proper and judicial
proceedings by or against the Compact Commission shall be brought solely and
exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Compact Commission is located. The Compact Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative
dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or
propriety of venue in any action against a Licensee for professional malpractice,
misconduct, or any such similar matter.

HCS SB 1092 25
(3) The Compact Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in
any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact and shall
have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the
Compact Commission service of process shall render a judgment or order void as to the
Compact Commission, this Compact, or promulgated Rules.
2. (1) If the Compact Commission determines that a Member State has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or
the promulgated Rules, the Compact Commission shall provide written notice to the
defaulting State. The notice of default shall describe the default, the proposed means of
curing the default, and any other action that the Compact Commission may take and
shall offer training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
(2) The Compact Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the
other Member States.
3. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting State may be
terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of
the Member States, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred on that State by
this Compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the
default does not relieve the offending State of obligations or liabilities incurred during
the period of default.
4. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only after all
other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or
terminate shall be given by the Compact Commission to the governor, the majority and
minority leaders of the defaulting State's legislature, the defaulting State's Licensing
Authority, and each of the Member States' Licensing Authority.
5. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments,
obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including
obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
6. Upon the termination of a State's membership from this Compact, that State
shall immediately provide notice to all Licensees within that State of such termination.
The terminated State shall continue to recognize all Compact Privileges granted
pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of six months after the date of said notice of
termination.
7. The Compact Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State that is
found to be in default or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless agreed
upon in writing between the Compact Commission and the defaulting State.
8. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the Compact Commission by
petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district

HCS SB 1092 26
where the Compact Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
9. (1) Upon request by a Member State, the Compact Commission shall attempt
to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among Member States and between
Member and non-Member States.
(2) The Compact Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
10. (1) By supermajority vote, the Compact Commission may initiate legal
action against a Member State in default in the United States District Court for the
District of Columbia or the federal district where the Compact Commission has its
principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its
promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages.
In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. The remedies herein shall
not be the exclusive remedies of the Compact Commission. The Compact Commission
may pursue any other remedies available under federal or the defaulting Member
State's law.
(2) A Member State may initiate legal action against the Compact Commission
in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
Compact Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions
of the Compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable
attorney's fees.
(3) No party other than a Member State shall enforce this Compact against the
Compact Commission.
324.1855. 1. (1) The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the
Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Member State.
(2) (a) On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Compact Commission
shall convene and review the enactment of each of the first seven Member States
("Charter Member States") to determine if the statute enacted by each such Charter
Member State is materially different than the model Compact statute.
(b) A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to be materially different
from the model Compact statute shall be entitled to the default process set forth in
section 324.1850.
(c) If any Member State is later found to be in default, or is terminated, or
withdraws from the Compact, the Compact Commission shall remain in existence and

HCS SB 1092 27
the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number of Member States should be less
than seven.
(3) Member States enacting the Compact subsequent to the seven initial Charter
Member States shall be subject to the process set forth in subdivision (21) of subsection
3 of section 324.1835 to determine if their enactments are materially different from the
model Compact statute and whether they qualify for participation in the Compact.
(4) All actions taken for the benefit of the Compact Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to the effective
date of the Compact or the Compact Commission coming into existence shall be
considered to be actions of the Compact Commission unless specifically repudiated by
the Compact Commission.
(5) Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the Compact Commission's
initial adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be subject to the Rules and bylaws as they
exist on the date on which the Compact becomes law in that State. Any Rule that has
been previously adopted by the Compact Commission shall have the full force and effect
of law on the day the Compact becomes law in that State.
2. (1) Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a
statute repealing the same.
(2) A Member State's withdrawal shall not take effect until 180 days after
enactment of the repealing statute.
(3) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing
State's Licensing Authority to comply with the investigative and Adverse Action
reporting requirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
(4) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this Compact, a State
shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all Licensees within that State.
Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing
State shall continue to recognize all Compact Privileges granted pursuant to this
Compact for a minimum of 180 days after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
3. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent
any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a Member State
and a non-Member State that does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
4. This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No amendment to this
Compact shall become effective and binding upon any Member State until it is enacted
into the laws of all Member States.
324.1860. 1. This Compact and the Compact Commission's rulemaking
authority shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes and the
implementation and administration of the Compact. Provisions of the Compact

HCS SB 1092 28
expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of Rules shall not be construed to
limit the Compact Commission's rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
2. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause,
sentence, or provision of this Compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be
contrary to the constitution of any Member State, a State seeking participation in the
Compact, or of the United States, or the applicability thereof to any government,
agency, person, or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof
to any other government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
3. Notwithstanding subsection 2 of this section, the Compact Commission may
deny a State's participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the requirements of
subsection 2 of section 324.1850, terminate a Member State's participation in the
Compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement of a Member State is a
material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be
contrary to the constitution of any Member State, the Compact shall remain in full force
and effect as to the remaining Member States and in full force and effect as to the
Member State affected as to all severable matters.
324.1865. 1. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any
other law of a Member State that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
2. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a Member State
in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
3. All permissible agreements between the Compact Commission and the
Member States are binding in accordance with their terms.
332.081. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, hospitals
licensed under chapter 197 shall be authorized to employ any or all of the following oral
health providers:
(1) A dentist licensed under this chapter for the purpose of treating on hospital
premises those patients who present with a dental condition and such treatment is necessary to
ameliorate the condition for which they presented such as severe pain or tooth abscesses;
(2) An oral and maxillofacial surgeon licensed under this chapter for the purpose of
treating oral conditions that need to be ameliorated as part of treating the underlying cause of
the patient's medical needs including, but not limited to, head and neck cancer, HIV or AIDS,
severe trauma resulting in admission to the hospital, organ transplant, diabetes, or seizure
disorders. It shall be a condition of treatment that such patients are admitted to the hospital on
either an in- or out-patient basis; and
(3) A maxillofacial prosthodontist licensed under this chapter for the purpose of
treating and supporting patients of a head and neck cancer team or other complex care or

HCS SB 1092 29
surgical team for the fabrication of appliances following ablative surgery, surgery to correct
birth anomalies, extensive radiation treatment of the head or neck, or trauma-related surgery.
2. No person or other entity shall practice dentistry in Missouri or provide dental
services as [defined] describedin section 332.071 unless and until the board has issued to the
person a certificate certifying that the person has been duly registered as a dentist in Missouri
or the board has issued such certificate to an entity that has been duly registered to provide
dental services by licensed dentists and dental hygienists and unless and until the board has
issued to the person a license, to be renewed each period, as provided in this chapter, to
practice dentistry or as a dental hygienist, or has issued to the person or entity a permit, to be
renewed each period, to provide dental services in Missouri. Nothing in this chapter shall be
so construed as to make it unlawful for:
(1) A legally qualified physician or surgeon, who does not practice dentistry as a
specialty, from extracting teeth;
(2) A dentist licensed in a state other than Missouri from making a clinical
demonstration before a meeting of dentists in Missouri;
(3) Dental students in any accredited dental school to practice dentistry under the
personal direction of instructors;
(4) Dental hygiene students in any accredited dental hygiene school to practice dental
hygiene under the personal direction of instructors;
(5) A duly registered and licensed dental hygienist in Missouri to practice dental
hygiene as defined in section 332.091;
(6) A dental assistant, certified dental assistant, or expanded functions dental assistant
to be delegated duties as defined in section 332.093;
(7) A duly registered dentist or dental hygienist to teach in an accredited dental or
dental hygiene school;
(8) A person who has been granted a dental faculty permit under section 332.183 to
practice dentistry in the scope of his or her employment at an accredited dental school,
college, or program in Missouri;
(9) A duly qualified anesthesiologist or nurse anesthetist to administer an anesthetic
in connection with dental services or dental surgery;
(10) A person to practice dentistry in or for:
(a) The United States Armed Forces;
(b) The United States Public Health Service;
(c) Migrant, community, or health care for the homeless health centers provided in
Section 330 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Section 254b);
(d) Federally qualified health centers as defined in Section 1905(l) (42 U.S.C. Section
1396d(l)) of the Social Security Act;

HCS SB 1092 30
(e) Governmental entities, including county health departments; or
(f) The United States Veterans Bureau; or
(11) A dentist licensed in a state other than Missouri to evaluate a patient or render an
oral, written, or otherwise documented dental opinion when providing testimony or records
for the purpose of a civil or criminal action before any judicial or administrative proceeding
of this state or other forum in this state.
3. No corporation shall practice dentistry as defined in section 332.071 unless that
corporation is organized under the provisions of chapter 355 or 356 provided that a
corporation organized under the provisions of chapter 355 and qualifying as an organization
under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)(3) may only employ dentists and dental hygienists licensed in
this state to render dental services to Medicaid recipients, low-income individuals who have
available income below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level, and all participants
in the SCHIP program, unless such limitation is contrary to or inconsistent with federal or
state law or regulation. This subsection shall not apply to:
(1) A hospital licensed under chapter 197 that provides care and treatment only to
children under the age of eighteen at which a person regulated under this chapter provides
dental care within the scope of his or her license or registration;
(2) A federally qualified health center as defined in Section 1905(l) of the Social
Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)), or a migrant, community, or health care for the
homeless health center provided for in Section 330 of the Public Health Services Act (42
U.S.C. Section 254b) at which a person regulated under this chapter provides dental care
within the scope of his or her license or registration;
(3) A city or county health department organized under chapter 192 or chapter 205 at
which a person regulated under this chapter provides dental care within the scope of his or her
license or registration;
(4) A social welfare board organized under section 205.770, a city health department
operating under a city charter, or a city-county health department at which a person regulated
under this chapter provides dental care within the scope of his or her license or registration;
(5) Any entity that has received a permit from the dental board and does not receive
compensation from the patient or from any third party on the patient's behalf at which a
person regulated under this chapter provides dental care within the scope of his or her license
or registration; or
(6) Any hospital nonprofit corporation exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, that engages in its operations and provides dental
services at facilities owned by a city, county, or other political subdivision of the state, or any
entity contracted with the state to provide care in a correctional center, as such term is

HCS SB 1092 31
defined in section 217.010, at which a person regulated under this chapter provides dental
care within the scope of his or her license or registration.

If any of the entities exempted from the requirements of this subsection are unable to provide
services to a patient due to the lack of a qualified provider and a referral to another entity is
made, the exemption shall extend to the person or entity that subsequently provides services
to the patient.
4. No unincorporated organization shall practice dentistry as defined in section
332.071 unless such organization is exempt from federal taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and provides dental treatment without
compensation from the patient or any third party on their behalf as a part of a broader
program of social services including food distribution. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit
100 organizations under this subsection from employing any person regulated by this chapter.
101 5. A dentist shall not enter into a contract that allows a person who is not a dentist to
102 influence or interfere with the exercise of the dentist's independent professional judgment.
103 6. A not-for-profit corporation organized under the provisions of chapter 355 and
104 qualifying as an organization under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)(3), an unincorporated
105 organization operating pursuant to subsection 4 of this section, or any other person should not
106 direct or interfere or attempt to direct or interfere with a licensed dentist's professional
107 judgment and competent practice of dentistry. Nothing in this subsection shall be so
108 construed as to make it unlawful for not-for-profit organizations to enforce employment
109 contracts, corporate policy and procedure manuals, or quality improvement or assurance
110 requirements.
111 7. All entities defined in subsection 3 of this section and those exempted under
112 subsection 4 of this section shall apply for a permit to employ dentists and dental hygienists
113 licensed in this state to render dental services, and the entity shall apply for the permit in
114 writing on forms provided by the Missouri dental board. The board shall not charge a fee of
115 any kind for the issuance or renewal of such permit. The provisions of this subsection shall
116 not apply to a federally qualified health center as defined in Section 1905(l) of the Social
117 Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)).
118 8. Any entity that obtains a permit to render dental services in this state is subject to
119 discipline pursuant to section 332.321. If the board concludes that the person or entity has
120 committed an act or is engaging in a course of conduct that would be grounds for disciplinary
121 action, the board may file a complaint before the administrative hearing commission. The
122 board may refuse to issue or renew the permit of any entity for one or any combination of
123 causes stated in subsection 2 of section 332.321. The board shall notify the applicant in

HCS SB 1092 32
124 writing of the reasons for the refusal and shall advise the applicant of his or her right to file a
125 complaint with the administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
126 9. A federally qualified health center as defined in Section 1905(l) of the Social
127 Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)) shall register with the board. The information
128 provided to the board as part of the registration shall include the name of the health center, the
129 nonprofit status of the health center, sites where dental services will be provided, and the
130 names of all persons employed by, or contracting with, the health center who are required to
131 hold a license pursuant to this chapter. The registration shall be renewed every twenty-four
132 months. The board shall not charge a fee of any kind for the issuance or renewal of the
133 registration. The registration of the health center shall not be subject to discipline pursuant to
134 section 332.321. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit disciplinary action against a
135 licensee of this chapter who is employed by, or contracts with, such health center for the
136 actions of the licensee in connection with such employment or contract.
137 10. The board may promulgate rules and regulations to ensure not-for-profit
138 corporations are rendering care to the patient populations as set forth herein, including
139 requirements for covered not-for-profit corporations to report patient census data to the board.
140 The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a federally qualified health center as
141 defined in Section 1905(l) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)).
142 11. All not-for-profit corporations organized or operated pursuant to the provisions of
143 chapter 355 and qualifying as an organization under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)(3), or the
144 requirements relating to migrant, community, or health care for the homeless health centers
145 provided in Section 330 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Section 254b) and
146 federally qualified health centers as defined in Section 1905(l) (42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l))
147 of the Social Security Act, that employ persons who practice dentistry or dental hygiene in
148 this state shall do so in accordance with the relevant laws of this state except to the extent that
149 such laws are contrary to, or inconsistent with, federal statute or regulation.
332.700. Sections 332.700 to 332.760 shall be known and cited as the Dentist and
Dental Hygienist Compact. The purposes of this Compact are to facilitate the interstate
practice of dentistry and dental hygiene and improve public access to dentistry and
dental hygiene services by providing Dentists and Dental Hygienists licensed in a
Participating State the ability to practice in Participating States in which they are not
licensed. The Compact does this by establishing a pathway for Dentists and Dental
Hygienists licensed in a Participating State to obtain a Compact Privilege that
authorizes them to practice in another Participating State in which they are not licensed.
The Compact enables Participating States to protect the public health and safety with
respect to the practice of such Dentists and Dental Hygienists, through the State's

HCS SB 1092 33
authority to regulate the practice of dentistry and dental hygiene in the State. The
Compact:
(1) Enables Dentists and Dental Hygienists who qualify for a Compact Privilege
to practice in other Participating States without satisfying burdensome and duplicative
requirements associated with securing a License to practice in those States;
(2) Promotes mobility and addresses workforce shortages through each
Participating State's acceptance of a Compact Privilege to practice in that State;
(3) Increases public access to qualified, licensed Dentists and Dental Hygienists
by creating a responsible, streamlined pathway for Licensees to practice in Participating
States;
(4) Enhances the ability of Participating States to protect the public's health and
safety;
(5) Does not interfere with licensure requirements established by a Participating
State;
(6) Facilitates the sharing of licensure and disciplinary information among
Participating States;
(7) Requires Dentists and Dental Hygienists who practice in a Participating State
pursuant to a Compact Privilege to practice within the Scope of Practice authorized in
that State;
(8) Extends the authority of a Participating State to regulate the practice of
dentistry and dental hygiene within its borders to Dentists and Dental Hygienists who
practice in the State through a Compact Privilege;
(9) Promotes the cooperation of Participating States in regulating the practice of
dentistry and dental hygiene within those States;
(10) Facilitates the relocation of military members and their spouses who are
licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene.
332.705. As used in this Compact, unless the context requires otherwise, the
following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Active Military Member" means any person with full-time duty status in
the armed forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard and
Reserve.
(2) "Adverse Action" means disciplinary action or encumbrance imposed on a
License or Compact Privilege by a State Licensing Authority.
(3) "Alternative Program" means a non-disciplinary monitoring or practice
remediation process applicable to a Dentist or Dental Hygienist approved by a State
Licensing Authority of a Participating State in which the Dentist or Dental Hygienist is

HCS SB 1092 34
licensed. This includes, but is not limited to, programs to which Licensees with
substance abuse or addiction issues are referred in lieu of Adverse Action.
(4) "Clinical Assessment" means examination or process, required for licensure
as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist as applicable, that provides evidence of clinical
competence in dentistry or dental hygiene.
(5) "Commissioner" means the individual appointed by a Participating State to
serve as the member of the Commission for that Participating State.
(6) "Compact" means this Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact.
(7) "Compact Privilege" means the authorization granted by a Remote State to
allow a Licensee from a Participating State to practice as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist
in a Remote State.
(8) "Continuing Professional Development" means a requirement, as a condition
of License renewal to provide evidence of successful participation in educational or
professional activities relevant to practice or area of work.
(9) "Criminal Background Check" means the submission of fingerprints or
other biometric-based information for a License applicant for the purpose of obtaining
that applicant's criminal history record information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d)
from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the State's criminal history record
repository as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(f).
(10) "Data System" means the Commission's repository of information about
Licensees, including but not limited to examination, licensure, investigative, Compact
Privilege, Adverse Action, and Alternative Program.
(11) "Dental Hygienist" means an individual who is licensed by a State Licensing
Authority to practice dental hygiene.
(12) "Dentist" means an individual who is licensed by a State Licensing
Authority to practice dentistry.
(13) "Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact Commission" or "Commission"
means a joint government agency established by this Compact comprised of each State
that has enacted the Compact and a national administrative body comprised of a
Commissioner from each State that has enacted the Compact.
(14) "Encumbered License" means a License that a State Licensing Authority
has limited in any way other than through an Alternative Program.
(15) "Executive Board" means the Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer
and any other Commissioners as may be determined by Commission Rule or bylaw.
(16) "Jurisprudence Requirement" means the assessment of an individual's
knowledge of the laws and Rules governing the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene,
as applicable, in a State.

HCS SB 1092 35
(17) "License" means current authorization by a State, other than authorization
pursuant to a Compact Privilege, or other privilege, for an individual to practice as a
Dentist or Dental Hygienist in that State.
(18) "Licensee" means an individual who holds an unrestricted License from a
Participating State to practice as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist in that State.
(19) "Model Compact" means the model for the Dentist and Dental Hygienist
Compact on file with the Council of State Governments or other entity as designated by
the Commission.
(20) "Participating State" means a State that has enacted the Compact and been
admitted to the Commission in accordance with the provisions herein and Commission
Rules.
(21) "Qualifying License" means a License that is not an Encumbered License
issued by a Participating State to practice dentistry or dental hygiene.
(22) "Remote State" means a Participating State where a Licensee who is not
licensed as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist is exercising or seeking to exercise the Compact
Privilege.
(23) "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by an entity that has the force of
law.
(24) "Scope of Practice" means the procedures, actions, and processes a Dentist
or Dental Hygienist licensed in a State is permitted to undertake in that State and the
circumstances under which the Licensee is permitted to undertake those procedures,
actions and processes. Such procedures, actions and processes and the circumstances
under which they may be undertaken may be established through means, including, but
not limited to, statute, regulations, case law, and other processes available to the State
Licensing Authority or other government agency.
(25) "Significant Investigative Information" means information, records, and
documents received or generated by a State Licensing Authority pursuant to an
investigation for which a determination has been made that there is probable cause to
believe that the Licensee has violated a statute or regulation that is considered more
than a minor infraction for which the State Licensing Authority could pursue Adverse
Action against the Licensee.
(26) "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United
States of America that regulates the practices of dentistry and dental hygiene.
(27) "State Licensing Authority" means an agency or other entity of a State that
is responsible for the licensing and regulation of Dentists or Dental Hygienists.
332.710. 1. In order to join the Compact and thereafter continue as a
Participating State, a State must:

HCS SB 1092 36
(1) Enact a compact that is not materially different from the Model Compact as
determined in accordance with Commission Rules;
(2) Participate fully in the Commission's Data System;
(3) Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about
its Licensees and License applicants;
(4) Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of the Compact and
Commission Rules, of any Adverse Action or the availability of Significant Investigative
Information regarding a Licensee and License applicant;
(5) Fully implement a Criminal Background Check requirement, within a time
frame established by Commission Rule, by receiving the results of a qualifying Criminal
Background Check;
(6) Comply with the Commission Rules applicable to a Participating State;
(7) Accept the National Board Examinations of the Joint Commission on
National Dental Examinations or another examination accepted by Commission Rule as
a licensure examination;
(8) Accept for licensure that applicants for a Dentist License graduate from a
predoctoral dental education program accredited by the Commission on Dental
Accreditation, or another accrediting agency recognized by the United States
Department of Education for the accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene
education programs, leading to the Doctor of Dental Surgery (D.D.S.) or Doctor of
Dental Medicine (D.M.D.) degree;
(9) Accept for licensure that applicants for a Dental Hygienist License graduate
from a dental hygiene education program accredited by the Commission on Dental
Accreditation or another accrediting agency recognized by the United States
Department of Education for the accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene
education programs;
(10) Require for licensure that applicants successfully complete a Clinical
Assessment;
(11) Have Continuing Professional Development requirements as a condition for
License renewal; and
(12) Pay a participation fee to the Commission as established by Commission
Rule.
2. Providing alternative pathways for an individual to obtain an unrestricted
License does not disqualify a State from participating in the Compact.
3. When conducting a Criminal Background Check the State Licensing
Authority shall:
(1) Consider that information in making a licensure decision;

HCS SB 1092 37
(2) Maintain documentation of completion of the Criminal Background Check
and background check information to the extent allowed by State and federal law; and
(3) Report to the Commission whether it has completed the Criminal
Background Check and whether the individual was granted or denied a License.
4. A Licensee of a Participating State who has a Qualifying License in that State
and does not hold an Encumbered License in any other Participating State, shall be
issued a Compact Privilege in a Remote State in accordance with the terms of the
Compact and Commission Rules. If a Remote State has a Jurisprudence Requirement a
Compact Privilege will not be issued to the Licensee unless the Licensee has satisfied the
Jurisprudence Requirement.
332.715. 1. To obtain and exercise the Compact Privilege under the terms and
provisions of the Compact, the Licensee shall:
(1) Have a Qualifying License as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist in a Participating
State;
(2) Be eligible for a Compact Privilege in any Remote State in accordance with
subsections 4, 7, and 8 of this section;
(3) Submit to an application process whenever the Licensee is seeking a Compact
Privilege;
(4) Pay any applicable Commission and Remote State fees for a Compact
Privilege in the Remote State;
(5) Meet any Jurisprudence Requirement established by a Remote State in
which the Licensee is seeking a Compact Privilege;
(6) Have passed a National Board Examination of the Joint Commission on
National Dental Examinations or another examination accepted by Commission Rule;
(7) For a Dentist, have graduated from a predoctoral dental education program
accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation, or another accrediting agency
recognized by the United States Department of Education for the accreditation of
dentistry and dental hygiene education programs, leading to the Doctor of Dental
Surgery (D.D.S.) or Doctor of Dental Medicine (D.M.D.) degree;
(8) For a Dental Hygienist, have graduated from a dental hygiene education
program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation or another accrediting
agency recognized by the United States Department of Education for the accreditation
of dentistry and dental hygiene education programs;
(9) Have successfully completed a Clinical Assessment for licensure;
(10) Report to the Commission Adverse Action taken by any non-Participating
State when applying for a Compact Privilege and, otherwise, within thirty (30) days
from the date the Adverse Action is taken;

HCS SB 1092 38
(11) Report to the Commission when applying for a Compact Privilege the
address of the Licensee's primary residence and thereafter immediately report to the
Commission any change in the address of the Licensee's primary residence; and
(12) Consent to accept service of process by mail at the Licensee's primary
residence on record with the Commission with respect to any action brought against the
Licensee by the Commission or a Participating State, and consent to accept service of a
subpoena by mail at the Licensee's primary residence on record with the Commission
with respect to any action brought or investigation conducted by the Commission or a
Participating State.
2. The Licensee must comply with the requirements of subsection 1 of this
section to maintain the Compact Privilege in the Remote State. If those requirements
are met, the Compact Privilege will continue as long as the Licensee maintains a
Qualifying License in the State through which the Licensee applied for the Compact
Privilege and pays any applicable Compact Privilege renewal fees.
3. A Licensee providing dentistry or dental hygiene in a Remote State under the
Compact Privilege shall function within the Scope of Practice authorized by the Remote
State for a Dentist or Dental Hygienist licensed in that State.
4. A Licensee providing dentistry or dental hygiene pursuant to a Compact
Privilege in a Remote State is subject to that State's regulatory authority. A Remote
State may, in accordance with due process and that State's laws, by Adverse Action
revoke or remove a Licensee's Compact Privilege in the Remote State for a specific
period of time and impose fines or take any other necessary actions to protect the health
and safety of its citizens. If a Remote State imposes an Adverse Action against a
Compact Privilege that limits the Compact Privilege, that Adverse Action applies to all
Compact Privileges in all Remote States. A Licensee whose Compact Privilege in a
Remote State is removed for a specified period of time is not eligible for a Compact
Privilege in any other Remote State until the specific time for removal of the Compact
Privilege has passed and all encumbrance requirements are satisfied.
5. If a License in a Participating State is an Encumbered License, the Licensee
shall lose the Compact Privilege in a Remote State and shall not be eligible for a
Compact Privilege in any Remote State until the License is no longer encumbered.
6. Once an Encumbered License in a Participating State is restored to good
standing, the Licensee must meet the requirements of subsection 1 of this section to
obtain a Compact Privilege in a Remote State.
7. If a Licensee's Compact Privilege in a Remote State is removed by the Remote
State, the individual shall lose or be ineligible for the Compact Privilege in any Remote
State until the following occur:

HCS SB 1092 39
(1) The specific period of time for which the Compact Privilege was removed has
ended; and
(2) All conditions for removal of the Compact Privilege have been satisfied.
8. Once the requirements of subsection 7 of this section have been met, the
Licensee must meet the requirements in subsection 1 of this section to obtain a Compact
Privilege in a Remote State.
332.720. An Active Military Member and their spouse shall not be required to
pay to the Commission for a Compact Privilege the fee otherwise charged by the
Commission. If a Remote State chooses to charge a fee for a Compact Privilege, it may
choose to charge a reduced fee or no fee to an Active Military Member and their spouse
for a Compact Privilege.
332.725. 1. A Participating State in which a Licensee is licensed shall have
exclusive authority to impose Adverse Action against the Qualifying License issued by
that Participating State.
2. A Participating State may take Adverse Action based on the Significant
Investigative Information of a Remote State, so long as the Participating State follows its
own procedures for imposing Adverse Action.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Participating State's decision that
participation in an Alternative Program may be used in lieu of Adverse Action and that
such participation shall remain non-public if required by the Participating State's laws.
Participating States must require Licensees who enter any Alternative Program in lieu
of discipline to agree not to practice pursuant to a Compact Privilege in any other
Participating State during the term of the Alternative Program without prior
authorization from such other Participating State.
4. Any Participating State in which a Licensee is applying to practice or is
practicing pursuant to a Compact Privilege may investigate actual or alleged violations
of the statutes and regulations authorizing the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene in
any other Participating State in which the Dentist or Dental Hygienist holds a License or
Compact Privilege.
5. A Remote State shall have the authority to:
(1) Take Adverse Actions as set forth in subsection 4 of section 332.715 against a
Licensee's Compact Privilege in the State;
(2) In furtherance of its rights and responsibilities under the Compact and the
Commission's Rules issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require
the attendance and testimony of witnesses, and the production of evidence. Subpoenas
issued by a State Licensing Authority in a Participating State for the attendance and
testimony of witnesses, or the production of evidence from another Participating State,

HCS SB 1092 40
shall be enforced in the latter State by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to
the practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings
pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses,
mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes of the State where the witnesses
or evidence are located; and
(3) If otherwise permitted by State law, recover from the Licensee the costs of
investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any Adverse Action taken against
that Licensee.
6. (1) In addition to the authority granted to a Participating State by its Dentist
or Dental Hygienist licensure act or other applicable State law, a Participating State
may jointly investigate Licensees with other Participating States.
(2) Participating States shall share any Significant Investigative Information,
litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation
initiated under the Compact.
7. (1) After a Licensee's Compact Privilege in a Remote State is terminated, the
Remote State may continue an investigation of the Licensee that began when the
Licensee had a Compact Privilege in that Remote State.
(2) If the investigation yields what would be Significant Investigative
Information had the Licensee continued to have a Compact Privilege in that Remote
State, the Remote State shall report the presence of such information to the Data System
as required by subdivision (6) of subsection 2 of section 332.735 as if it was Significant
Investigative Information.
332.730. 1. The Compact Participating States hereby create and establish a joint
government agency whose membership consists of all Participating States that have
enacted the Compact. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Participating States
acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one State. The Commission shall come
into existence on or after the effective date of the Compact as set forth in subsection 1 of
section 332.750.
2. (1) Each Participating State shall have and be limited to one (1)
Commissioner selected by that Participating State's State Licensing Authority or, if
the State has more than one State Licensing Authority, selected collectively by the State
Licensing Authorities.
(2) The Commissioner shall be a member or designee of such Authority or
Authorities.
(3) The Commission may by Rule or bylaw establish a term of office for
Commissioners and may by Rule or bylaw establish term limits.

HCS SB 1092 41
(4) The Commission may recommend to a State Licensing Authority or
Authorities, as applicable, removal or suspension of an individual as the State's
Commissioner.
(5) A Participating State's State Licensing Authority, or Authorities, as
applicable, shall fill any vacancy of its Commissioner on the Commission within sixty
(60) days of the vacancy.
(6) Each Commissioner shall be entitled to one vote on all matters that are voted
upon by the Commission.
(7) The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The Commission may meet
by telecommunication, video conference or other similar electronic means.
3. The Commission shall have the following powers:
(1) Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
(2) Establish a code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
(3) Adopt Rules and bylaws;
(4) Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
(5) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this
Compact, the Commission's Rules, and the bylaws;
(6) Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
Commission, provided that the standing of any State Licensing Authority to sue or be
sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
(7) Maintain and certify records and information provided to a Participating
State as the authenticated business records of the Commission, and designate a person
to do so on the Commission's behalf;
(8) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(9) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not
limited to, employees of a Participating State;
(10) Conduct an annual financial review;
(11) Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties,
grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact,
and establish the Commission's personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of
interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
(12) As set forth in the Commission Rules, charge a fee to a Licensee for the
grant of a Compact Privilege in a Remote State and thereafter, as may be established by
Commission Rule, charge the Licensee a Compact Privilege renewal fee for each
renewal period in which that Licensee exercises or intends to exercise the Compact
Privilege in that Remote State. Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent a Remote

HCS SB 1092 42
State from charging a Licensee a fee for a Compact Privilege or renewals of a Compact
Privilege, or a fee for the Jurisprudence Requirement if the Remote State imposes such
a requirement for the grant of a Compact Privilege;
(13) Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money, other
sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and receive, utilize, and
dispose of the same; provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid any
appearance of impropriety and/or conflict of interest;
(14) Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real,
personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
(15) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise
dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
(16) Establish a budget and make expenditures;
(17) Borrow money;
(18) Appoint committees, including standing committees, which may be
composed of members, State regulators, State legislators or their representatives, and
consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in
this Compact and the bylaws;
(19) Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement
agencies;
(20) Elect a Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer and such other officers
of the Commission as provided in the Commission's bylaws;
(21) Establish and elect an Executive Board;
(22) Adopt and provide to the Participating States an annual report;
(23) Determine whether a State's enacted compact is materially different from
the Model Compact language such that the State would not qualify for participation in
the Compact; and
(24) Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve
the purposes of this Compact.
4. (1) All meetings of the Commission that are not closed pursuant to this
subsection shall be open to the public. Notice of public meetings shall be posted on the
Commission's website at least thirty (30) days prior to the public meeting.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Commission may
convene an emergency public meeting by providing at least twenty-four (24) hours prior
notice on the Commission's website, and any other means as provided in the
Commission's Rules, for any of the reasons it may dispense with notice of proposed
rulemaking under subsection 13 of section 332.740. The Commission's legal counsel

HCS SB 1092 43
shall certify that one of the reasons justifying an emergency public meeting has been
met.
(3) Notice of all Commission meetings shall provide the time, date, and location
of the meeting, and if the meeting is to be held or accessible via telecommunication,
video conference, or other electronic means, the notice shall include the mechanism for
access to the meeting through such means.
(4) The Commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting for the
Commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
(a) Non-compliance of a Participating State with its obligations under the
Compact;
(b) The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices or
procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the Commission's
100 internal personnel practices and procedures;
101 (c) Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee or Compact Privilege holder
102 by the Commission or by a Participating State's Licensing Authority;
103 (d) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
104 (e) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or
105 real estate;
106 (f) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
107 (g) Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or
108 confidential;
109 (h) Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly
110 unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
111 (i) Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
112 (j) Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of
113 or for use of the Commission or other committee charged with responsibility of
114 investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact;
115 (k) Legal advice;
116 (l) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the public by federal or
117 Participating State law; and
118 (m) Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by Rule.
119 (5) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall state
120 that the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and
121 such reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
122 (6) The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all
123 matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions
124 taken, and the reasons therefor, including a description of the views expressed. All

HCS SB 1092 44
125 documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes.
126 All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to
127 release only by a majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent
128 jurisdiction.
129 5. (1) The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable
130 expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
131 (2) The Commission may accept any and all appropriate sources of revenue,
132 donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services.
133 (3) The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each
134 Participating State and impose fees on Licensees of Participating States when a
135 Compact Privilege is granted, to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the
136 Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual
137 budget as approved each fiscal year for which sufficient revenue is not provided by
138 other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for Participating States shall
139 be allocated based upon a formula that the Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
140 (4) The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the
141 funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any
142 Participating State, except by and with the authority of the Participating State.
143 (5) The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
144 disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be subject
145 to the financial review and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. All
146 receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission shall be subject to an
147 annual financial review by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of
148 the financial review shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the
149 Commission.
150 6. (1) The Executive Board shall have the power to act on behalf of the
151 Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The powers, duties, and
152 responsibilities of the Executive Board shall include:
153 (a) Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the administration of the Compact
154 including compliance with the provisions of the Compact and the Commission's Rules
155 and bylaws;
156 (b) Recommending to the Commission changes to the Rules or bylaws, changes
157 to this Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact Participating States, fees charged
158 to Licensees, and other fees;
159 (c) Ensuring Compact administration services are appropriately provided,
160 including by contract;
161 (d) Preparing and recommending the budget;

HCS SB 1092 45
162 (e) Maintaining financial records on behalf of the Commission;
163 (f) Monitoring Compact compliance of Participating States and providing
164 compliance reports to the Commission;
165 (g) Establishing additional committees as necessary;
166 (h) Exercising the powers and duties of the Commission during the interim
167 between Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending Rules, adopting or
168 amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the
169 Commission by Rule or bylaw; and
170 (i) Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the Commission.
171 (2) The Executive Board shall be composed of up to seven (7) members:
172 (a) The Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer of the Commission and any
173 other members of the Commission who serve on the Executive Board shall be voting
174 members of the Executive Board; and
175 (b) Other than the Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary, and Treasurer, the Commission
176 may elect up to three (3) voting members from the current membership of the
177 Commission.
178 (3) The Commission may remove any member of the Executive Board as
179 provided in the Commission's bylaws.
180 (4) The Executive Board shall meet at least annually.
181 (a) An Executive Board meeting at which it takes or intends to take formal
182 action on a matter shall be open to the public, except that the Executive Board may meet
183 in a closed, non-public session of a public meeting when dealing with any of the matters
184 covered under subdivision (4) of subsection 4 of this section.
185 (b) The Executive Board shall give five (5) business days' notice of its public
186 meetings, posted on its website and as it may otherwise determine to provide notice to
187 persons with an interest in the public matters the Executive Board intends to address at
188 those meetings.
189 (5) The Executive Board may hold an emergency meeting when acting for the
190 Commission to:
191 (a) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
192 (b) Prevent a loss of Commission or Participating State funds; or
193 (c) Protect public health and safety.
194 7. (1) The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives
195 of the Commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally and in their
196 official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or
197 other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or
198 omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a

HCS SB 1092 46
199 reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment,
200 duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to
201 protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability
202 caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The
203 procurement of insurance of any type by the Commission shall not in any way
204 compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
205 (2) The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director,
206 employee, and representative of the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose
207 liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within
208 the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by
209 the Commission that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis
210 for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
211 responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that
212 person from retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and provided further,
213 that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person's
214 intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
215 (3) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, should any member,
216 officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the Commission be held liable
217 for the amount of any settlement or judgment arising out of any actual or alleged act,
218 error, or omission that occurred within the scope of that individual's employment,
219 duties, or responsibilities for the Commission, or that the person to whom that
220 individual is liable had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of the
221 individual's employment, duties, or responsibilities for the Commission, the
222 Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless such individual, provided that the
223 actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or
224 wanton misconduct of the individual.
225 (4) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any
226 Licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by
227 any other applicable State laws.
228 (5) Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate
229 a Participating State's state action immunity or state action affirmative defense with
230 respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or
231 federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
232 (6) Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign
233 immunity by the Participating States or by the Commission.
332.735. 1. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,
operation, and utilization of a coordinated database and reporting system containing

HCS SB 1092 47
licensure, Adverse Action, and the presence of Significant Investigative Information on
all Licensees and applicants for a License in Participating States.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary, a
Participating State shall submit a uniform data set to the Data System on all individuals
to whom this Compact is applicable as required by the Rules of the Commission,
including:
(1) Identifying information;
(2) Licensure data;
(3) Adverse Actions against a Licensee, License applicant or Compact Privilege
and information related thereto;
(4) Non-confidential information related to Alternative Program participation,
the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information related to
such participation;
(5) Any denial of an application for licensure, and the reason or reasons for such
denial (excluding the reporting of any criminal history record information where
prohibited by law);
(6) The presence of Significant Investigative Information; and
(7) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this Compact or
the protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of the Commission.
3. The records and information provided to a Participating State pursuant to
this Compact or through the Data System, when certified by the Commission or an
agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business records of the Commission,
and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-
judicial or administrative proceedings in a Participating State.
4. Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in any
Participating State will only be available to other Participating States.
5. It is the responsibility of the Participating States to monitor the database to
determine whether Adverse Action has been taken against a Licensee or License
applicant. Adverse Action information pertaining to a Licensee or License applicant in
any Participating State will be available to any other Participating State.
6. Participating States contributing information to the Data System may
designate information that may not be shared with the public without the express
permission of the contributing State.
7. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently expunged
pursuant to federal law or the laws of the Participating State contributing the
information shall be removed from the Data System.

HCS SB 1092 48
332.740. 1. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in order to
effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and provisions of the
Compact. A Commission Rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect only if a court
of competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is invalid because the Commission
exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of
the Compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable
standard of review.
2. The Commission shall promulgate Rules in accordance with the authority
granted under this Compact. All Commission Rules shall be consistent with the
Constitution of the United States and, to the extent applicable, the constitutions of
Participating States, and shall further the purposes and intent of this Compact. Any
Rule adopted by the Commission that exceeds the scope of the Commission's authority
or is otherwise inconsistent with this Compact or applicable constitutional requirements
shall be subject to challenge and determination in accordance with the dispute
resolution and enforcement provisions under section 332.745 of this Compact.
3. The Rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in each Participating
State, provided however that where the Rules of the Commission conflict with the laws
of the Participating State that establish the Participating State's Scope of Practice as
held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the Commission shall be
ineffective in that State to the extent of the conflict.
4. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria
set forth in this section and the Rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding
as of the date specified by the Commission for each Rule.
5. If a majority of the legislatures of the Participating States rejects a
Commission Rule or portion of a Commission Rule, by enactment of a statute or
resolution in the same manner used to adopt the Compact, within four (4) years of the
date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have no further force and effect in any
Participating State or to any State applying to participate in the Compact.
6. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the Commission.
7. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission shall hold a public
hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions,
and arguments.
8. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Commission, and at least thirty
(30) days in advance of the meeting at which the Commission will hold a public hearing
on the proposed Rule, the Commission shall provide a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking:
(1) On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible platform;

HCS SB 1092 49
(2) To persons who have requested notice of the Commission's notices of
proposed rulemaking; and
(3) In such other way or ways as the Commission may by Rule specify.
9. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
(1) The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the Commission
will hear public comments on the proposed Rule and, if different, the time, date, and
location of the meeting where the Commission will consider and vote on the proposed
Rule;
(2) If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other
electronic means, the Commission shall include the mechanism for access to the hearing
in the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking;
(3) The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
(4) A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any interested person;
and
(5) The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
10. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written
comments and documents received by the Commission in response to the proposed Rule
shall be available to the public.
11. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on
each Commission Rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Commission
at hearings required by this section.
12. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all Commissioners, take final
action on the proposed Rule based on the rulemaking record.
(1) The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule provided the
changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed Rule.
(2) The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for substantive
changes made to the proposed Rule as well as reasons for substantive changes not made
that were recommended by commenters.
(3) The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the Rule.
Except for an emergency as provided in subsection 13 of this section, the effective date
of the Rule shall be no sooner than thirty (30) days after the Commission issuing the
notice that it adopted or amended the Rule.
13. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may consider
and adopt an emergency Rule with 24 hours' notice, with opportunity to comment,
provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in this
section shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no

HCS SB 1092 50
event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the Rule. For the purposes of
this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
(1) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
(2) Prevent a loss of Commission or Participating State funds;
(3) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is established by federal
law or rule; or
(4) Protect public health and safety.
14. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may direct
revisions to a previously adopted Rule for purposes of correcting typographical errors,
errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any
revisions shall be posted on the website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject
to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision
may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a
Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the Commission prior to the
end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without
further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the
approval of the Commission.
15. No Participating State's rulemaking requirements shall apply under this
Compact.
332.745. 1. (1) The executive and judicial branches of State government in each
Participating State shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to implement the Compact.
(2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall
be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the
principal office of the Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative
dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or
propriety of venue in any action against a Licensee for professional malpractice,
misconduct or any such similar matter.
(3) The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any
proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact or Commission
Rule and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure
to provide the Commission service of process shall render a judgment or order void as
to the Commission, this Compact, or promulgated Rules.
2. (1) If the Commission determines that a Participating State has defaulted in
the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the
promulgated Rules, the Commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting State.

HCS SB 1092 51
The notice of default shall describe the default, the proposed means of curing the
default, and any other action that the Commission may take, and shall offer training
and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
(2) The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other
Participating States.
3. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting State may be
terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the
Commissioners, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred on that State by this
Compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default
does not relieve the offending State of obligations or liabilities incurred during the
period of default.
4. Termination of participation in the Compact shall be imposed only after all
other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or
terminate shall be given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and minority
leaders of the defaulting State's legislature, the defaulting State's State Licensing
Authority or Authorities, as applicable, and each of the Participating States' State
Licensing Authority or Authorities, as applicable.
5. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments,
obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including
obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
6. Upon the termination of a State's participation in this Compact, that State
shall immediately provide notice to all Licensees of the State, including Licensees of
other Participating States issued a Compact Privilege to practice within that State, of
such termination. The terminated State shall continue to recognize all Compact
Privileges then in effect in that State for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days
after the date of said notice of termination.
7. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State that is found to be
in default or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing
between the Commission and the defaulting State.
8. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the Commission by petitioning
the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district
where the Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded
all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
9. (1) Upon request by a Participating State, the Commission shall attempt to
resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among Participating States and
between Participating States and non-Participating States.

HCS SB 1092 52
(2) The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both mediation and
binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
10. (1) The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce
the provisions of this Compact and the Commission's Rules.
(2) By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal action against a
Participating State in default in the United States District Court for the District of
Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its principal offices to
enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated Rules. The
relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. The remedies herein shall not be the
exclusive remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other
remedies available under federal or the defaulting Participating State's law.
(3) A Participating State may initiate legal action against the Commission in the
United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where
the Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the
Compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive
relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party
shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
(4) No individual or entity other than a Participating State may enforce this
Compact against the Commission.
332.750. 1. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the
Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Participating State.
(1) On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Commission shall convene
and review the enactment of each of the States that enacted the Compact prior to the
Commission convening ("Charter Participating States") to determine if the statute
enacted by each such Charter Participating State is materially different than the Model
Compact.
(a) A Charter Participating State whose enactment is found to be materially
different from the Model Compact shall be entitled to the default process set forth in
section 332.745.
(b) If any Participating State is later found to be in default, or is terminated or
withdraws from the Compact, the Commission shall remain in existence and the
Compact shall remain in effect even if the number of Participating States should be less
than seven (7).
(2) Participating States enacting the Compact subsequent to the Charter
Participating States shall be subject to the process set forth in subdivision (23) of

HCS SB 1092 53
subsection 3 of section 332.730 to determine if their enactments are materially different
from the Model Compact and whether they qualify for participation in the Compact.
(3) All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in furtherance of the
purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to the effective date of the Compact
or the Commission coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the
Commission unless specifically repudiated by the Commission.
(4) Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the Commission's initial
adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be subject to the Commission's Rules and bylaws
as they exist on the date on which the Compact becomes law in that State. Any Rule
that has been previously adopted by the Commission shall have the full force and effect
of law on the day the Compact becomes law in that State.
2. Any Participating State may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a
statute repealing that State's enactment of the Compact.
(1) A Participating State's withdrawal shall not take effect until one hundred
eighty (180) days after enactment of the repealing statute.
(2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing
State's Licensing Authority or Authorities to comply with the investigative and Adverse
Action reporting requirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
(3) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this Compact, the State
shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all Licensees within that State.
Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing
State shall continue to recognize all Compact Privileges to practice within that State
granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days after
the date of such notice of withdrawal.
3. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent
any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a Participating
State and a non-Participating State that does not conflict with the provisions of this
Compact.
4. This Compact may be amended by the Participating States. No amendment to
this Compact shall become effective and binding upon any Participating State until it is
enacted into the laws of all Participating States.
332.755. 1. This Compact and the Commission's rulemaking authority shall be
liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation and
administration of the Compact. Provisions of the Compact expressly authorizing or
requiring the promulgation of Rules shall not be construed to limit the Commission's
rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.

HCS SB 1092 54
2. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause,
sentence or provision of this Compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be
contrary to the constitution of any Participating State, a State seeking participation in
the Compact, or of the United States, or the applicability thereof to any government,
agency, person or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof
to any other government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
3. Notwithstanding subsection 2 of this section, the Commission may deny a
State's participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the requirements of
subsection 2 of section 332.745, terminate a Participating State's participation in the
Compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement of a Participating State is a
material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be
contrary to the constitution of any Participating State, the Compact shall remain in full
force and effect as to the remaining Participating States and in full force and effect as to
the Participating State affected as to all severable matters.
332.760. 1. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other
law of a Participating State that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
2. Except as explicitly permitted herein, nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule
of the Commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability
of a Participating State to enact and enforce laws, regulations, or other rules related to
the practice of dentistry and dental hygiene within such Participating State, including
but not limited to standards of practice, Scope of Practice, office safety requirements,
patient care standards, and all other aspects of professional practice occurring within
such Participating State's borders.
3. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a Participating
State in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
4. All permissible agreements between the Commission and the Participating
States are binding in accordance with their terms.
334.1800. 1. Sections 334.1800 to 334.1860 shall be known and may be cited as
the "Physician Assistant Licensure Compact".
2. In order to strengthen access to Medical Services, and in recognition of the
advances in the delivery of Medical Services, the Participating States of the PA
Licensure Compact have allied in common purpose to develop a comprehensive process
that complements the existing authority of State Licensing Boards to license and
discipline physician assistants and seeks to enhance the portability of a License to
practice as a physician assistant while safeguarding the safety of patients. This
Compact allows Medical Services to be provided by physician assistants, via the mutual

HCS SB 1092 55
recognition of the Licensee's Qualifying License by other Compact Participating States.
This Compact also adopts the prevailing standard for physician assistant licensure and
affirms that the practice and delivery of Medical Services by the physician assistant
occurs where the patient is located at the time of the patient encounter, and therefore
requires the physician assistant to be under the jurisdiction of the State Licensing Board
where the patient is located. State Licensing Boards that participate in this Compact
retain the jurisdiction to impose Adverse Action against a Compact Privilege in that
State issued to a physician assistant through the procedures of this Compact. The PA
Licensure Compact will alleviate burdens for military families by allowing active duty
military personnel and their spouses to obtain a Compact Privilege based on having an
unrestricted License in good standing from a Participating State.
334.1805. In this Compact:
(1) "Adverse Action" means any administrative, civil, equitable, or criminal
action permitted by a State's laws which is imposed by a Licensing Board or other
authority against a physician assistant License or License application or Compact
Privilege such as License denial, censure, revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring
of the Licensee, or restriction on the Licensee's practice.
(2) "Compact Privilege" means the authorization granted by a Remote State to
allow a Licensee from another Participating State to practice as a physician assistant to
provide Medical Services and other licensed activity to a patient located in the Remote
State under the Remote State's laws and regulations.
(3) "Conviction" means a finding by a court that an individual is guilty of a
felony or misdemeanor offense through adjudication or entry of a plea of guilt or no
contest to the charge by the offender.
(4) "Criminal Background Check" means the submission of fingerprints or
other biometric-based information for a License applicant for the purpose of obtaining
that applicant's criminal history record information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d),
from the State's criminal history record repository as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(f).
(5) "Data System" means the repository of information about Licensees,
including but not limited to License status and Adverse Actions, which is created and
administered under the terms of this Compact.
(6) "Executive Committee" means a group of directors and ex-officio individuals
elected or appointed pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection 6 of section 334.1830.
(7) "Impaired Practitioner" means a physician assistant whose practice is
adversely affected by health-related condition(s) that impact their ability to practice.
(8) "Investigative Information" means information, records, or documents
received or generated by a Licensing Board pursuant to an investigation.

HCS SB 1092 56
(9) "Jurisprudence Requirement" means the assessment of an individual's
knowledge of the laws and Rules governing the practice of a physician assistant in a
State.
(10) "License" means current authorization by a State, other than authorization
pursuant to a Compact Privilege, for a physician assistant to provide Medical Services,
which would be unlawful without current authorization.
(11) "Licensee" means an individual who holds a License from a State to provide
Medical Services as a physician assistant.
(12) "Licensing Board" means any State entity authorized to license and
otherwise regulate physician assistants.
(13) "Medical Services" means health care services provided for the diagnosis,
prevention, treatment, cure or relief of a health condition, injury, or disease, as defined
by a State's laws and regulations. The medical services provided by a physician
assistant to a patient located in Missouri are defined by Missouri's state laws and
regulations.
(14) "Model Compact" means the model for the PA Licensure Compact on file
with The Council of State Governments or other entity as designated by the
Commission.
(15) "Participating State" means a State that has enacted this Compact.
(16) "PA" or "Physician Assistant" means an individual who is licensed as a
physician assistant in a State. For purposes of this Compact, any other title or status
adopted by a State to replace the term "physician assistant" shall be deemed
synonymous with "physician assistant" and shall confer the same rights and
responsibilities to the Licensee under the provisions of this Compact at the time of its
enactment.
(17) "PA Licensure Compact Commission," "Compact Commission," or
"Commission" mean the national administrative body created pursuant to subsection
1 of section 334.1830 of this Compact.
(18) "Qualifying License" means an unrestricted License issued by a
Participating State to provide Medical Services as a physician assistant.
(19) "Remote State" means a Participating State where a Licensee who is not
licensed as a physician assistant is exercising or seeking to exercise the Compact
Privilege.
(20) "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by an entity that has the force and
effect of law.
(21) "Significant Investigative Information" means Investigative Information
that a Licensing Board, after an inquiry or investigation that includes notification and

HCS SB 1092 57
an opportunity for the physician assistant to respond if required by State law, has
reason to believe is not groundless and, if proven true, would indicate more than a
minor infraction.
(22) "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United
States.
334.1810. 1. To participate in this Compact, a Participating State shall:
(1) License physician assistants.
(2) Participate in the Compact Commission's Data System.
(3) Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints
against Licensees and License applicants.
(4) Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of this Compact and
Commission Rules, of any Adverse Action against a Licensee or License applicant and
the existence of Significant Investigative Information regarding a Licensee or License
applicant.
(5) Fully implement a Criminal Background Check requirement, within a time
frame established by Commission Rule, by its Licensing Board receiving the results of a
Criminal Background Check and reporting to the Commission whether the License
applicant has been granted a License.
(6) Comply with the Rules of the Compact Commission.
(7) Utilize passage of a recognized national exam such as the NCCPA PANCE as
a requirement for physician assistant licensure.
(8) Grant the Compact Privilege to a holder of a Qualifying License in a
Participating State.
2. Nothing in this Compact prohibits a Participating State from charging a fee
for granting the Compact Privilege.
334.1815. 1. To exercise the Compact Privilege, a Licensee must:
(1) Have graduated from a physician assistant program accredited by the
Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the Physician Assistant, Inc. or
other programs authorized by Commission Rule.
(2) Hold current NCCPA certification.
(3) Have no felony or misdemeanor Conviction.
(4) Have never had a controlled substance license, permit, or registration
suspended or revoked by a State or by the United States Drug Enforcement
Administration.
(5) Have a unique identifier as determined by Commission Rule.
(6) Hold a Qualifying License.

HCS SB 1092 58
(7) Have had no revocation of a License or limitation or restriction on any
License currently held due to an adverse action.
(8) If a Licensee has had a limitation or restriction on a License or Compact
Privilege due to an Adverse Action, two years must have elapsed from the date on which
the License or Compact Privilege is no longer limited or restricted due to the Adverse
Action.
(9) If a Compact Privilege has been revoked or is limited or restricted in a
Participating State for conduct that would not be a basis for disciplinary action in a
Participating State in which the Licensee is practicing or applying to practice under a
Compact Privilege, that Participating State shall have the discretion not to consider
such action as an Adverse Action requiring the denial or removal of a Compact
Privilege in that State.
(10) Notify the Compact Commission that the Licensee is seeking the Compact
Privilege in a Remote State.
(11) Meet any Jurisprudence Requirement of a Remote State in which the
Licensee is seeking to practice under the Compact Privilege and pay any fees applicable
to satisfying the Jurisprudence Requirement.
(12) Report to the Commission any Adverse Action taken by a non-participating
State within thirty (30) days after the action is taken.
2. The Compact Privilege is valid until the expiration or revocation of the
Qualifying License unless terminated pursuant to an Adverse Action. The Licensee
must also comply with all of the requirements of subsection 1 of this section to maintain
the Compact Privilege in a Remote State. If the Participating State takes Adverse
Action against a Qualifying License, the Licensee shall lose the Compact Privilege in any
Remote State in which the Licensee has a Compact Privilege until all of the following
occur:
(1) The License is no longer limited or restricted; and
(2) Two (2) years have elapsed from the date on which the License is no longer
limited or restricted due to the Adverse Action.
3. Once a restricted or limited License satisfies the requirements of subdivisions
(1) and (2) of subsection 2 of this section, the Licensee must meet the requirements of
subsection 1 of this section to obtain a Compact Privilege in any Remote State.
4. For each Remote State in which a physician assistant seeks authority to
prescribe controlled substances, the physician assistant shall satisfy all requirements
imposed by such State in granting or renewing such authority.
334.1820. Upon a Licensee's application for a Compact Privilege, the Licensee
shall identify to the Commission the Participating State from which the Licensee is

HCS SB 1092 59
applying, in accordance with applicable Rules adopted by the Commission, and subject
to the following requirements:
(1) When applying for a Compact Privilege, the Licensee shall provide the
Commission with the address of the Licensee's primary residence and thereafter shall
immediately report to the Commission any change in the address of the Licensee's
primary residence.
(2) When applying for a Compact Privilege, the Licensee is required to consent
to accept service of process by mail at the Licensee's primary residence on file with the
Commission with respect to any action brought against the Licensee by the Commission
or a Participating State, including a subpoena, with respect to any action brought or
investigation conducted by the Commission or a Participating State.
334.1825. 1. A Participating State in which a Licensee is licensed shall have
exclusive power to impose Adverse Action against the Qualifying License issued by that
Participating State.
2. In addition to the other powers conferred by State law, a Remote State shall
have the authority, in accordance with existing State due process law, to do all of the
following:
(1) Take Adverse Action against a physician assistant's Compact Privilege within
that State to remove a Licensee's Compact Privilege or take other action necessary
under applicable law to protect the health and safety of its citizens.
(2) Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the
attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas
issued by a Licensing Board in a Participating State for the attendance and testimony of
witnesses or the production of evidence from another Participating State shall be
enforced in the latter State by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to the
practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings
pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses,
mileage and other fees required by the service statutes of the State in which the
witnesses or evidence are located.
(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (2) of this subsection, subpoenas may not be
issued by a Participating State to gather evidence of conduct in another State that is
lawful in that other State for the purpose of taking Adverse Action against a Licensee's
Compact Privilege or application for a Compact Privilege in that Participating State.
(4) Nothing in this Compact authorizes a Participating State to impose discipline
against a physician assistant's Compact Privilege or to deny an application for a
Compact Privilege in that Participating State for the individual's otherwise lawful
practice in another State.

HCS SB 1092 60
3. For purposes of taking Adverse Action, the Participating State which issued
the Qualifying License shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct
received from any other Participating State as it would if the conduct had occurred
within the Participating State which issued the Qualifying License. In so doing, that
Participating State shall apply its own State laws to determine appropriate action.
4. A Participating State, if otherwise permitted by State law, may recover from
the affected physician assistant the costs of investigations and disposition of cases
resulting from any Adverse Action taken against that physician assistant.
5. A Participating State may take Adverse Action based on the factual findings
of a Remote State, provided that the Participating State follows its own procedures for
taking the Adverse Action.
6. (1) In addition to the authority granted to a Participating State by its
respective State physician assistant laws and regulations or other applicable State law,
any Participating State may participate with other Participating States in joint
investigations of Licensees.
(2) Participating States shall share any investigative, litigation, or compliance
materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under this
Compact.
7. If an Adverse Action is taken against a physician assistant's Qualifying
License, the physician assistant's Compact Privilege in all Remote States shall be
deactivated until two (2) years have elapsed after all restrictions have been removed
from the State License. All disciplinary orders by the Participating State which issued
the Qualifying License that impose Adverse Action against a physician assistant's
License shall include a Statement that the physician assistant's Compact Privilege is
deactivated in all Participating States during the pendency of the order.
8. If any Participating State takes Adverse Action, it promptly shall notify the
administrator of the Data System.
334.1830. 1. The Participating States hereby create and establish a joint
government agency and national administrative body known as the PA Licensure
Compact Commission. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact States
acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one State. The Commission shall come
into existence on or after the effective date of the Compact as set forth in subsection 1 of
section 334.1850.
2. (1) Each Participating State shall have and be limited to one (1) delegate
selected by that Participating State's Licensing Board or, if the State has more than one
Licensing Board, selected collectively by the Participating State's Licensing Boards.
(2) The delegate shall be either:

HCS SB 1092 61
(a) A current physician assistant, physician or public member of a Licensing
Board or physician assistant Council/Committee; or
(b) An administrator of a Licensing Board.
(3) Any delegate may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the
laws of the State from which the delegate is appointed.
(4) The Participating State Licensing Board shall fill any vacancy occurring in
the Commission within sixty (60) days.
(5) Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote on all matters voted on by the
Commission and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business and
affairs of the Commission. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as
provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates' participation in
meetings by telecommunications, video conference, or other means of communication.
(6) The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in this Compact and the bylaws.
(7) The Commission shall establish by Rule a term of office for delegates.
3. The Commission shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) Establish a code of ethics for the Commission;
(2) Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
(3) Establish fees;
(4) Establish bylaws;
(5) Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
(6) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this
Compact and the bylaws;
(7) Promulgate Rules limited to the Commission's authority to facilitate and
coordinate implementation and administration of this Compact. The Rules authorized
by the Compact shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all
Participating States;
(8) Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
Commission, provided that the standing of any State Licensing Board to sue or be sued
under applicable law shall not be affected;
(9) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(10) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not
limited to, employees of a Participating State;
(11) Hire employees and engage contractors, elect or appoint officers, fix
compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out
the purposes of this Compact, and establish the Commission's personnel policies and

HCS SB 1092 62
programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related
personnel matters;
(12) Accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of money, equipment,
supplies, materials and services, and receive, utilize and dispose of the same; provided
that at all times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict
of interest;
(13) Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise own,
hold, improve or use, any property, real, personal or mixed; provided that at all times
the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety;
(14) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise
dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
(15) Establish a budget and make expenditures;
(16) Borrow money;
(17) Appoint committees, including standing committees composed of members,
State regulators, State legislators or their representatives, and consumer
representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in this
Compact and the bylaws;
(18) Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement
agencies;
(19) Elect a Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer and such other officers
of the Commission as provided in the Commission's bylaws;
(20) Reserve for itself, in addition to those reserved exclusively to the
Commission under the Compact, powers that the Executive Committee may not
exercise;
(21) Approve or disapprove a State's participation in the Compact based upon
its determination as to whether the State's Compact legislation departs in a material
manner from the Model Compact language;
(22) Prepare and provide to the Participating States an annual report; and
(23) Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve
the purposes of this Compact consistent with the State regulation of physician assistant
licensure and practice.
4. (1) All meetings of the Commission that are not closed pursuant to this
subsection shall be open to the public. Notice of public meetings shall be posted on the
Commission's website at least thirty (30) days prior to the public meeting.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Commission may
convene a public meeting by providing at least twenty-four (24) hours prior notice on
the Commission's website, and any other means as provided in the Commission's Rules,

HCS SB 1092 63
for any of the reasons it may dispense with notice of proposed rulemaking under
subsection 12 of section 334.1840.
(3) The Commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting or non-public
part of a public meeting to receive legal advice or to discuss:
(a) Non-compliance of a Participating State with its obligations under this
Compact;
(b) The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices or
procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the Commission's
internal personnel practices and procedures;
(c) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
(d) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or
real estate;
(e) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
(f) Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is
privileged or confidential;
(g) Disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would
100 constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
101 (h) Disclosure of investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
102 (i) Disclosure of information related to any investigative reports prepared by or
103 on behalf of or for use of the Commission or other committee charged with
104 responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to this
105 Compact;
106 (j) Legal advice; or
107 (k) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or Participating
108 States' statutes.
109 (4) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to this provision, the
110 chair of the meeting or the chair's designee shall certify that the meeting or portion of
111 the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision.
112 (5) The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all
113 matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions
114 taken, including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in
115 connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and
116 documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority
117 vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
118 5. (1) The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable
119 expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.

HCS SB 1092 64
120 (2) The Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources,
121 donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services.
122 (3) The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each
123 Participating State and may impose Compact Privilege fees on Licensees of
124 Participating States to whom a Compact Privilege is granted to cover the cost of the
125 operations and activities of the Commission and its staff, which must be in a total
126 amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved by the Commission each year
127 for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment
128 amount levied on Participating States shall be allocated based upon a formula to be
129 determined by Commission Rule.
130 (a) A Compact Privilege expires when the Licensee's Qualifying License in the
131 Participating State from which the Licensee applied for the Compact Privilege expires.
132 (b) If the Licensee terminates the Qualifying License through which the Licensee
133 applied for the Compact Privilege before its scheduled expiration, and the Licensee has
134 a Qualifying License in another Participating State, the Licensee shall inform the
135 Commission that it is changing to that Participating State the Participating State
136 through which it applies for a Compact Privilege and pay to the Commission any
137 Compact Privilege fee required by Commission Rule.
138 (4) The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the
139 funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any of
140 the Participating States, except by and with the authority of the Participating State.
141 (5) The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
142 disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be subject
143 to the financial review and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. All
144 receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission shall be subject to an
145 annual financial review by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of
146 the financial review shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the
147 Commission.
148 6. (1) The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the
149 Commission according to the terms of this Compact and Commission Rules.
150 (2) The Executive Committee shall be composed of nine (9) members:
151 (a) Seven voting members who are elected by the Commission from the current
152 membership of the Commission;
153 (b) One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized national physician
154 assistant professional association; and
155 (c) One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized national physician
156 assistant certification organization.

HCS SB 1092 65
157 (3) The ex-officio members will be selected by their respective organizations.
158 (4) The Commission may remove any member of the Executive Committee as
159 provided in its bylaws.
160 (5) The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
161 (6) The Executive Committee shall have the following duties and responsibilities:
162 (a) Recommend to the Commission changes to the Commission's Rules or
163 bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees to be paid by Compact Participating
164 States such as annual dues, and any Commission Compact fee charged to Licensees for
165 the Compact Privilege;
166 (b) Ensure Compact administration services are appropriately provided,
167 contractual or otherwise;
168 (c) Prepare and recommend the budget;
169 (d) Maintain financial records on behalf of the Commission;
170 (e) Monitor Compact compliance of Participating States and provide compliance
171 reports to the Commission;
172 (f) Establish additional committees as necessary;
173 (g) Exercise the powers and duties of the Commission during the interim
174 between Commission meetings, except for issuing proposed rulemaking or adopting
175 Commission Rules or bylaws, or exercising any other powers and duties exclusively
176 reserved to the Commission by the Commission's Rules; and
177 (h) Perform other duties as provided in the Commission's Rules or bylaws.
178 (7) All meetings of the Executive Committee at which it votes or plans to vote on
179 matters in exercising the powers and duties of the Commission shall be open to the
180 public and public notice of such meetings shall be given as public meetings of the
181 Commission are given.
182 (8) The Executive Committee may convene in a closed, non-public meeting for
183 the same reasons that the Commission may convene in a non-public meeting as set forth
184 in subdivision (3) of subsection 4 of this section and shall announce the closed meeting as
185 the Commission is required to under subdivision (4) of subsection 4 of this section and
186 keep minutes of the closed meeting as the Commission is required to under subdivision
187 (5) of subsection 4 of this section.
188 7. (1) The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives
189 of the Commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally and in their
190 official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or
191 other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or
192 omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a
193 reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment,

HCS SB 1092 66
194 duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to
195 protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability
196 caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The
197 procurement of insurance of any type by the Commission shall not in any way
198 compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
199 (2) The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director,
200 employee, and representative of the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose
201 liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within
202 the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by
203 the commission that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis
204 for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
205 responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that
206 person from retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and provided further,
207 that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person's
208 intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
209 (3) The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer,
210 executive director, employee, and representative of the Commission for the amount of
211 any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or
212 alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
213 employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis
214 for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
215 responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not
216 result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
217 (4) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall
218 be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the
219 principal office of the Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
220 jurisdictional defenses in any proceedings as authorized by Commission Rules.
221 (5) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any
222 Licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by
223 any other applicable State laws.
224 (6) Nothing herein shall be construed to designate the venue or jurisdiction to
225 bring actions for alleged acts of malpractice, professional misconduct, negligence, or
226 other such civil action pertaining to the practice of a physician assistant. All such
227 matters shall be determined exclusively by State law other than this Compact.
228 (7) Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate
229 a Participating State's state action immunity or state action affirmative defense with

HCS SB 1092 67
230 respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or
231 federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
232 (8) Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign
233 immunity by the Participating States or by the Commission.
334.1835. 1. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,
operation, and utilization of a coordinated data and reporting system containing
licensure, Adverse Action, and the reporting of the existence of Significant Investigative
Information on all licensed physician assistants and applicants denied a License in
Participating States.
2. Notwithstanding any other State law to the contrary, a Participating State
shall submit a uniform data set to the Data System on all physician assistants to whom
this Compact is applicable (utilizing a unique identifier) as required by the Rules of the
Commission, including:
(1) Identifying information;
(2) Licensure data;
(3) Adverse Actions against a License or Compact Privilege;
(4) Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason or reasons for such
denial (excluding the reporting of any Criminal history record information where
prohibited by law);
(5) The existence of Significant Investigative Information; and
(6) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this Compact, as
determined by the Rules of the Commission.
3. Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in any
Participating State shall only be available to other Participating States.
4. The Commission shall promptly notify all Participating States of any Adverse
Action taken against a Licensee or an individual applying for a License that has been
reported to it. This Adverse Action information shall be available to any other
Participating State.
5. Participating States contributing information to the Data System may, in
accordance with State or federal law, designate information that may not be shared with
the public without the express permission of the contributing State. Notwithstanding
any such designation, such information shall be reported to the Commission through the
Data System.
6. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently expunged
pursuant to federal law or the laws of the Participating State contributing the
information shall be removed from the Data System upon reporting of such by the
Participating State to the Commission.

HCS SB 1092 68
7. The records and information provided to a Participating State pursuant to
this Compact or through the Data System, when certified by the Commission or an
agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business records of the Commission,
and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-
judicial or administrative proceedings in a Participating State.
334.1840. 1. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers pursuant to
the criteria set forth in this Section and the Rules adopted thereunder. Commission
Rules shall become binding as of the date specified by the Commission for each Rule.
2. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in order to effectively and
efficiently implement and administer this Compact and achieve its purposes. A
Commission Rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of
competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is invalid because the Commission exercised
its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope of the purposes of this
Compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard
of review.
3. The Rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in each Participating
State, provided however that where the Rules of the Commission conflict with the laws
of the Participating State that establish the medical services a physician assistant may
perform in the Participating State, as held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the
Rules of the Commission shall be ineffective in that State to the extent of the conflict.
4. If a majority of the legislatures of the Participating States rejects a
Commission Rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to
adopt this Compact within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the Rule, then such
Rule shall have no further force and effect in any Participating State or to any State
applying to participate in the Compact.
5. Commission Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the
Commission.
6. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final Rule or Rules by the
Commission, and at least thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at which the Rule
will be considered and voted upon, the Commission shall file a Notice of Proposed
Rulemaking:
(1) On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible platform; and
(2) To persons who have requested notice of the Commission's notices of
proposed rulemaking; and
(3) In such other way(s) as the Commission may by Rule specify.
7. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:

HCS SB 1092 69
(1) The time, date, and location of the public hearing on the proposed Rule and
the proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which the proposed Rule will be
considered and voted upon;
(2) The text of the proposed Rule and the reason for the proposed Rule;
(3) A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any interested person
and the date by which written comments must be received; and
(4) The manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the
Commission of their intention to attend the public hearing or provide any written
comments.
8. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission shall allow persons to
submit written data, facts, opinions, and arguments, which shall be made available to
the public.
9. If the hearing is to be held via electronic means, the Commission shall publish
the mechanism for access to the electronic hearing.
(1) All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall as directed in the Notice
of Proposed Rulemaking, not less than five (5) business days before the scheduled date
of the hearing, notify the Commission of their desire to appear and testify at the hearing.
(2) Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person who wishes
to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing.
(3) All hearings shall be recorded. A copy of the recording and the written
comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments received in response to the proposed
rulemaking shall be made available to a person upon request.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on
each proposed Rule. Proposed Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the
Commission at hearings required by this section.
10. Following the public hearing the Commission shall consider all written and
oral comments timely received.
11. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all delegates, take final action on
the proposed Rule and shall determine the effective date of the Rule, if adopted, based
on the Rulemaking record and the full text of the Rule.
(1) If adopted, the Rule shall be posted on the Commission's website.
(2) The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule provided the
changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed Rule.
(3) The Commission shall provide on its website an explanation of the reasons
for substantive changes made to the proposed Rule as well as reasons for substantive
changes not made that were recommended by commenters.

HCS SB 1092 70
(4) The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the Rule.
Except for an emergency as provided in subsection 12 of this section, the effective date
of the Rule shall be no sooner than thirty (30) days after the Commission issued the
notice that it adopted the Rule.
12. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may consider
and adopt an emergency Rule with twenty-four (24) hours prior notice, without the
opportunity for comment, or hearing, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures
provided in this Compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as
soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective
date of the Rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must
be adopted immediately by the Commission in order to:
(1) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
(2) Prevent a loss of Commission or Participating State funds;
(3) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Commission Rule that is
established by federal law or Rule; or
(4) Protect public health and safety.
13. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may direct
revisions to a previously adopted Commission Rule for purposes of correcting
typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors.
Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the Commission. The
revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after
posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a
material change to a Rule. A challenge shall be made as set forth in the notice of
revisions and delivered to the Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no
challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is
challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.
14. No Participating State's rulemaking requirements shall apply under this
Compact.
334.1845. 1. (1) The executive and judicial branches of State government in
each Participating State shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to implement the Compact.
(2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall
be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the
principal office of the Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative
dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or

HCS SB 1092 71
propriety of venue in any action against a licensee for professional malpractice,
misconduct or any such similar matter.
(3) The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any
proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact or the
Commission's Rules and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all
purposes. Failure to provide the Commission with service of process shall render a
judgment or order in such proceeding void as to the Commission, this Compact, or
Commission Rules.
2. (1) If the Commission determines that a Participating State has defaulted in
the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the
Commission Rules, the Commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting State
and other Participating States. The notice shall describe the default, the proposed
means of curing the default and any other action that the Commission may take and
shall offer remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
(2) If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting State may be
terminated from this Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of
the Participating States, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this
Compact upon such State may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A
cure of the default does not relieve the offending State of obligations or liabilities
incurred during the period of default.
(3) Termination of participation in this Compact shall be imposed only after all
other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or
terminate shall be given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and minority
leaders of the defaulting State's legislature, and to the Licensing Board(s) of each of the
Participating States.
(4) A State that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments,
obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including
obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
(5) The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State that is found to be
in default or that has been terminated from this Compact, unless agreed upon in writing
between the Commission and the defaulting State.
(6) The defaulting State may appeal its termination from the Compact by the
Commission by petitioning the United States District Court for the District of Columbia
or the federal district where the Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing
member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's
fees.

HCS SB 1092 72
(7) Upon the termination of a State's participation in the Compact, the State
shall immediately provide notice to all Licensees within that State of such termination:
(a) Licensees who have been granted a Compact Privilege in that State shall
retain the Compact Privilege for one hundred eighty (180) days following the effective
date of such termination.
(b) Licensees who are licensed in that State who have been granted a Compact
Privilege in a Participating State shall retain the Compact Privilege for one hundred
eighty (180) days unless the Licensee also has a Qualifying License in a Participating
State or obtains a Qualifying License in a Participating State before the one hundred
eighty (180)-day period ends, in which case the Compact Privilege shall continue.
3. (1) Upon request by a Participating State, the Commission shall attempt to
resolve disputes related to this Compact that arise among Participating States and
between participating and non-Participating States.
(2) The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both mediation and
binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
4. (1) The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce
the provisions of this Compact and Rules of the Commission.
(2) If compliance is not secured after all means to secure compliance have been
exhausted, by majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal action in the United
States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
Commission has its principal offices, against a Participating State in default to enforce
compliance with the provisions of this Compact and the Commission's promulgated
Rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In
the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
(3) The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission.
The Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or State law.
5. (1) A Participating State may initiate legal action against the Commission in
the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district
where the Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions
of the Compact and its Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and
damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
(2) No person other than a Participating State shall enforce this Compact against
the Commission.
334.1850. 1. This Compact shall come into effect on the date on which this
Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Participating State.

HCS SB 1092 73
(1) On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Commission shall convene
and review the enactment of each of the States that enacted the Compact prior to the
Commission convening ("Charter Participating States") to determine if the statute
enacted by each such Charter Participating State is materially different than the Model
Compact.
(a) A Charter Participating State whose enactment is found to be materially
different from the Model Compact shall be entitled to the default process set forth in
subsection 2 of section 334.1845.
(b) If any Participating State later withdraws from the Compact or its
participation is terminated, the Commission shall remain in existence and the Compact
shall remain in effect even if the number of Participating States should be less than
seven. Participating States enacting the Compact subsequent to the Commission
convening shall be subject to the process set forth in subdivision (21) of subsection 3 of
section 334.1830 to determine if their enactments are materially different from the
Model Compact and whether they qualify for participation in the Compact.
(2) Participating States enacting the Compact subsequent to the seven initial
Charter Participating States shall be subject to the process set forth in subdivision (21)
of subsection 3 of section 334.1830 to determine if their enactments are materially
different from the Model Compact and whether they qualify for participation in the
Compact.
(3) All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in furtherance of the
purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to the effective date of the Compact
or the Commission coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the
Commission unless specifically repudiated by the Commission.
2. Any State that joins this Compact shall be subject to the Commission's Rules
and bylaws as they exist on the date on which this Compact becomes law in that State.
Any Rule that has been previously adopted by the Commission shall have the full force
and effect of law on the day this Compact becomes law in that State.
3. Any Participating State may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a
statute repealing the same.
(1) A Participating State's withdrawal shall not take effect until one hundred
eighty (180) days after enactment of the repealing statute. During this one hundred
eighty (180) day-period, all Compact Privileges that were in effect in the withdrawing
State and were granted to Licensees licensed in the withdrawing State shall remain in
effect. If any Licensee licensed in the withdrawing State is also licensed in another
Participating State or obtains a license in another Participating State within the one

HCS SB 1092 74
hundred eighty (180) days, the Licensee's Compact Privileges in other Participating
States shall not be affected by the passage of the one hundred eighty (180) days.
(2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the State
Licensing Board(s) of the withdrawing State to comply with the investigative, and
Adverse Action reporting requirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of
withdrawal.
(3) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing a State from this Compact, the
State shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all Licensees within that
State. Such withdrawing State shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant
to this Compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of such
notice of withdrawal.
4. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent
any physician assistant licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between
Participating States and between a Participating State and non-Participating State that
does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
5. This Compact may be amended by the Participating States. No amendment to
this Compact shall become effective and binding upon any Participating State until it is
enacted materially in the same manner into the laws of all Participating States as
determined by the Commission.
334.1855. 1. This Compact and the Commission's rulemaking authority shall be
liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation and
administration of the Compact. Provisions of the Compact expressly authorizing or
requiring the promulgation of Rules shall not be construed to limit the Commission's
rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
2. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause,
sentence or provision of this Compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be
contrary to the constitution of any Participating State, a State seeking participation in
the Compact, or of the United States, or the applicability thereof to any government,
agency, person or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof
to any other government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
3. Notwithstanding subsection 2 of this section, the Commission may deny a
State's participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the requirements of
subsection 2 of section 334.1845, terminate a Participating State's participation in the
Compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement of a Participating State is, or
would be with respect to a State seeking to participate in the Compact, a material
departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be contrary to

HCS SB 1092 75
the constitution of any Participating State, the Compact shall remain in full force and
effect as to the remaining Participating States and in full force and effect as to the
Participating State affected as to all severable matters.
334.1860. 1. Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a
Participating State that is not inconsistent with this Compact.
2. Any laws in a Participating State in conflict with this Compact are superseded
to the extent of the conflict.
3. All agreements between the Commission and the Participating States are
binding in accordance with their terms.
337.600. As used in sections 337.600 to 337.689, the following terms mean:
(1) "Advanced macro social worker", the applications of social work theory,
knowledge, methods, principles, values, and ethics; and the professional use of self to
community and organizational systems, systemic and macrocosm issues, and other indirect
nonclinical services; specialized knowledge and advanced practice skills in case management,
information and referral, nonclinical assessments, counseling, outcome evaluation, mediation,
nonclinical supervision, nonclinical consultation, expert testimony, education, outcome
evaluation, research, advocacy, social planning and policy development, community
organization, and the development, implementation and administration of policies,
programs, and activities. A licensed advanced macro social worker may not treat mental
or emotional disorders or provide psychotherapy without the direct supervision of a licensed
clinical social worker, or diagnose a mental disorder;
(2) "Clinical social work", the application of social work theory, knowledge, values,
methods, principles, and techniques of case work, group work, client-centered advocacy,
community organization, administration, planning, evaluation, consultation, research,
psychotherapy and counseling methods and techniques to persons, families and groups in
assessment, diagnosis, treatment, prevention and amelioration of mental and emotional
conditions;
(3) "Committee", the state committee for social workers established in section
337.622;
(4) "Department", the Missouri department of commerce and insurance;
(5) "Director", the director of the division of professional registration;
(6) "Division", the division of professional registration;
(7) "Independent practice", any practice of social workers outside of an organized
setting such as a social, medical, or governmental agency in which a social worker assumes
responsibility and accountability for services required;
(8) "Licensed advanced macro social worker", any person who offers to render
services to individuals, groups, families, couples, organizations, institutions, communities,

HCS SB 1092 76
government agencies, corporations, or the general public for a fee, monetary or otherwise,
implying that the person is trained, experienced, and licensed as an advanced macro social
worker, and who holds a current valid license to practice as an advanced macro social worker;
(9) "Licensed baccalaureate social worker", any person who offers to render services
to individuals, groups, organizations, institutions, corporations, government agencies, or the
general public for a fee, monetary or otherwise, implying that the person is trained,
experienced, and licensed as a baccalaureate social worker, and who holds a current valid
license to practice as a baccalaureate social worker;
(10) "Licensed clinical social worker", any person who offers to render services to
individuals, groups, organizations, institutions, corporations, government agencies, or the
general public for a fee, monetary or otherwise, implying that the person is trained,
experienced, and licensed as a clinical social worker, and who holds a current, valid license to
practice as a clinical social worker;
(11) "Licensed master social worker", any person who offers to render services to
individuals, groups, families, couples, organizations, institutions, communities, government
agencies, corporations, or the general public for a fee, monetary or otherwise, implying that
the person is trained, experienced, and licensed as a master social worker, and who holds a
current valid license to practice as a master social worker. A licensed master social worker
may not treat mental or emotional disorders, provide psychotherapy without the direct
supervision of a licensed clinical social worker, or diagnose a mental disorder;
(12) "Master social work", the application of social work theory, knowledge,
methods, and ethics and the professional use of self to restore or enhance social, psychosocial,
or biopsychosocial functioning of individuals, couples, families, groups, organizations,
communities, institutions, government agencies, or corporations. The practice includes the
applications of specialized knowledge and advanced practice skills in the areas of assessment,
treatment planning, implementation and evaluation, case management, mediation,
information and referral, counseling, client education, supervision, consultation, education,
research, advocacy, community organization and development, planning, evaluation,
implementation and administration of policies, programs, and activities. Under supervision
as provided in this section, the practice of master social work may include the practices
reserved to clinical social workers or advanced macro social workers for no more than forty-
eight consecutive calendar months for the purpose of obtaining licensure under section
337.615 or 337.645;
(13) "Practice of advanced macro social work", rendering, offering to render, or
supervising those who render to individuals, couples, families, groups, organizations,
institutions, corporations, government agencies, communities, or the general public any

HCS SB 1092 77
service involving the application of methods, principles, and techniques of advanced practice
macro social work;
(14) "Practice of baccalaureate social work", rendering, offering to render, or
supervising those who render to individuals, families, groups, organizations, institutions,
corporations, or the general public any service involving the application of methods,
principles, and techniques of baccalaureate social work;
(15) "Practice of clinical social work", rendering, offering to render, or supervising
those who render to individuals, couples, groups, organizations, institutions, corporations, or
the general public any service involving the application of methods, principles, and
techniques of clinical social work;
(16) "Practice of master social work", rendering, offering to render, or supervising
those who render to individuals, couples, families, groups, organizations, institutions,
corporations, government agencies, communities, or the general public any service involving
the application of methods, principles, and techniques of master social work;
(17) "Qualified advanced macro supervisor", any licensed social worker who meets
the qualifications of a qualified clinical supervisor or a licensed advanced macro social
worker who has:
(a) Practiced in the field of social work as a licensed social worker for which he or
she is supervising the applicant for a minimum of [five] three years;
(b) Successfully completed a minimum of sixteen hours of supervisory training from
the Association of Social Work Boards, the National Association of Social Workers, an
accredited university, or a program approved by the state committee for social workers. All
organizations providing the supervisory training shall adhere to the basic content and quality
standards outlined by the state committee on social work; and
(c) Met all the requirements of sections 337.600 to 337.689, and as defined by rule by
the state committee for social workers;
(18) "Qualified baccalaureate supervisor", any licensed social worker who meets the
qualifications of a qualified clinical supervisor, qualified master supervisor, qualified
advanced macro supervisor, or a licensed baccalaureate social worker who has:
(a) Practiced in the field of social work as a licensed social worker for which he or
she is supervising the applicant for a minimum of [five] three years;
(b) Successfully completed a minimum of sixteen hours of supervisory training from
the Association of Social Work Boards, the National Association of Social Workers, an
accredited university, or a program approved by the state committee for social workers. All
organizations providing the supervisory training shall adhere to the basic content and quality
100 standards outlined by the state committee on social workers; and

HCS SB 1092 78
101 (c) Met all the requirements of sections 337.600 to 337.689, and as defined by rule by
102 the state committee for social workers;
103 (19) "Qualified clinical supervisor", any licensed clinical social worker who has:
104 (a) Practiced in the field of social work as a licensed social worker for which he or
105 she is supervising the applicant for a minimum of [five] three years;
106 (b) Successfully completed a minimum of sixteen hours of supervisory training from
107 the Association of Social Work Boards, the National Association of Social Workers, an
108 accredited university, or a program approved by the state committee for social workers. All
109 organizations providing the supervisory training shall adhere to the basic content and quality
110 standards outlined by the state committee on social work; and
111 (c) Met all the requirements of sections 337.600 to 337.689, and as defined by rule by
112 the state committee for social workers;
113 (20) "Social worker", any individual that has:
114 (a) Received a baccalaureate degree in social work from an accredited social work
115 program approved by the Council on Social Work Education;
116 (b) Received a master's degree in social work from a social work program:
117 a. Accredited by the Council on Social Work Education; or
118 b. Recognized and approved by the committee in accordance with rules adopted by
119 the committee under section 337.627 and in accordance with the procedure set forth in section
120 337.628;
121 (c) Received a doctorate or Ph.D. in social work; or
122 (d) A current social worker license as set forth in sections 337.600 to 337.689.
345.050. To be eligible for licensure by the board by examination, each applicant
shall submit the application fee and shall furnish evidence of such person's current
competence and shall:
(1) Hold a master's or a doctoral degree from a program that was awarded
"accreditation candidate" status or is accredited by the Council on Academic Accreditation of
the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association or other accrediting agency approved
by the board in the area in which licensure is sought;
(2) Submit official transcripts from one or more accredited colleges or universities
presenting evidence of the completion of course work and clinical practicum requirements
equivalent to that required by the Council on Academic Accreditation of the American
Speech-Language-Hearing Association or other accrediting agency approved by the board;
(3) Present written evidence of completion of a clinical fellowship from supervisors.
The experience required by this subdivision shall follow the completion of the requirements
of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section. This period of employment shall be under the
direct supervision of a [person who is] licensed [by the state of Missouri in the profession in

HCS SB 1092 79
which the applicant seeks to be licensed] speech-language pathologist in good standing in
any state. Persons applying with an audiology clinical doctoral degree are exempt from this
provision; and
(4) Pass an examination promulgated or approved by the board. The board shall
determine the subject and scope of the examinations.
✔